




SEC Info - SBL Variable Annuity Account X - ‘N-4/A’ on 8/18/98 - EX-99.B3B










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




SBL Variable Annuity Account X – ‘N-4/A’ on 8/18/98 – EX-99.B3BAs of:  Tuesday, 8/18/98   ·   Accession #:  1061034-98-8   ·   File #s:  333-52491, 811-08779
Previous ‘N-4’:  ‘N-4’ on 5/12/98   ·   Latest ‘N-4’:  This Filing



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size

 8/18/98  SBL Variable Annuity Account X    N-4/A                 13:451KF-->Pre-Effective Amendment to Registration Statement for a Separate Account (Unit Investment Trust)   —   Form N-4Filing Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: N-4/A       Pre-Effective Amendment No. 1                         80±   393K 
12: EX-99.B10   Consent of Independent Auditors                        1      7K 
13: EX-99.B15   Powers of Attorney                                     9     30K 
 2: EX-99.B3B   Va Sales Agreement With Commission Schedule            3     21K 
 3: EX-99.B3C   Marketing Organization Agreement                       9±    41K 
 4: EX-99.B4A   Individual Contract                                   18    106K 
 5: EX-99.B4B   Individual Contract-Unisex                            18    105K 
 6: EX-99.B4C   Flex Prem Def Group Unalloc Var Ann Contract          14     78K 
 7: EX-99.B4D   Ira Endorsement                                        2     14K 
 8: EX-99.B5    Application                                            4±    17K 
 9: EX-99.B6A   Articles of Incorporation                              2     13K 
10: EX-99.B6B   Bylaws of Sbl                                          9±    38K 
11: EX-99.B9    Opinion of Counsel                                     2±    10K 

D-->EX-99.B3B   —   Va Sales Agreement With Commission Schedule
P-->EX-99.B3B1st Page of 3TOC↑TopPreviousNext↓BottomJust 1st 
[SBL LOGO]                                                                      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
A Member of The Security                               700 SW Harrison St.      
Benefit Group of Companies                             Topeka, Kansas 66636-0001
                                            (785) 431-3000

                                                         SBL VARIABLE PRODUCTS
                                                                   BROKER/DEALER
                                                                 SALES AGREEMENT

BROKER/DEALER:                                                                  
EFFECTIVE DATE:                                                                 

 1.  Security  Benefit  Life  Insurance  Company,  of  Topeka,  Kansas,  and its
     affiliated company, Security Distributors, Inc., hereinafter jointly called
     "SBL", hereby authorize the  above-designated  Broker/Dealer to solicit and
     service (1) variable annuities issued under Security Benefit Life Insurance
     Company's several Variable Annuity Accounts and (2) variable life insurance
     policies issued under Security  Benefit Life Insurance  Company's  variable
     life accounts,  each of which has been  registered as securities  under the
     Securities  Act of 1933 with Security  Distributors,  Inc. (a member of the
     National  Association of Securities  Dealers,  Inc.) having been designated
     Principal Underwriter thereof. Said variable annuity contracts and variable
life insurance policies are referred to herein as "Variable products."

 2.  Broker/Dealer hereby accepts such authorization to solicit and service such
     SBL variable  products and confirms that it is properly licensed to solicit
     and service such variable products for SBL and is a member in good standing
     of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc., hereinafter called
     "NASD",  and  further  agrees to notify  SBL if it ceases to be a member of
NASD.                                                                 

 3.  Broker/Dealer  shall have the  authority  to recruit,  train and  supervise
     registered  representatives  for the  sale  of  variable  products  of SBL.
     Appointment  of any  registered  representative  shall be  subject to prior
     approval  of SBL.  SBL  reserves  the right to require  termination  of any
     registered   representative's   right  to  sell  SBL   variable   products.
     Broker/Dealer  shall  be  responsible  for  any  registered  representative
     appointed hereunder complying with the terms, conditions and limitations as
     set forth in this Agreement.  All registered  representatives  recruited by
     Broker/Dealer  to sell SBL's  variable  products  shall be duly licensed as
     annuity producers and/or insurance  producers  pursuant to applicable state
     laws and regulations. Broker/Dealer shall be responsible for any registered
representative becoming so licensed.                                  

 4.  Commissions on stipulated payments or premiums accepted by SBL on behalf of
     an annuitant, participant, or policyholder of a variable product covered by
     this Agreement will be in accordance with the Schedule of Commissions  made
     part of this  Agreement,  and are in  full  consideration  of all  services
     rendered  and  expenses  incurred  hereunder  by the  Broker/Dealer  or its
     representatives.  First year  commissions  are payable  when an  individual
     variable annuity contract,  group variable annuity  certificate or variable
     life insurance policy is issued and paid for upon an application  submitted
     through Broker/Dealer and accepted by the applicant thereof.  Broker/Dealer
     is not authorized to deduct  commissions prior to forwarding any remittance
     received  to SBL.  All checks or drafts  received by the  Broker/Dealer  in
     regards to any variable  product shall be made payable to Security  Benefit
     Life Insurance Company. All compensation payable hereunder shall be subject
     to a first lien and may be reduced or set off as to any  indebtedness  owed
     by the  Broker/Dealer  to SBL. Any commissions paid to a third party at the
     request of the Broker/Dealer shall be deducted from the commissions payable
hereunder.                                                            

 5.  Broker/Dealer  agrees to be bound by the terms,  conditions and limitations
     set forth in this Agreement and the rules and practices of SBL that are now
     and  hereafter  in force.  Broker/Dealer  agrees  not to  solicit or submit
     applications  for  variable  products  to SBL unless it and its  registered
     representatives  are  properly  licensed,  and further  agrees that it will
     conform to all applicable state,  federal and local laws and regulations in
     conducting  business  under this  Agreement.  Both parties  hereby agree to
     abide by the applicable  Rules of Fair Practice of the NASD which Rules are
     incorporated  herein as if set forth in full. The signing of this Agreement
     and the purchase of variable  products pursuant thereto is a representation
     of SBL that Broker/Dealer is a properly registered  Broker/Dealer under the
Securities and Exchange Act of 1934.                                  

 6.  Neither the  Broker/Dealer nor its  representatives  are authorized to make
     any  representations  concerning the variable products,  its sponsor (SBL),
     the principal underwriter (Security  Distributors,  Inc.) or the underlying
     mutual funds except those contained in the applicable current  prospectuses
     and in the printed information  furnished by SBL.  Broker/Dealer agrees not
     to use any other  advertising  or sales  material  relating to the variable
products unless specifically approved in writing by SBL.              

VA6972 (R3-87)                                                                  

P-->EX-99.B3B2nd Page of 3TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 2nd
 7.  Broker/Dealer  is not authorized and has no authority (a) to make, alter or
     discharge  any  contract  for or on behalf of SBL, (b) endorse any check or
     draft  payable to SBL,  (c) to accept any  variable  product  consideration
     after  the  initial  remittance,  (d) to waive or  modify  any  prospectus,
     contract, policy or application provision, condition or obligation, and (e)
     to extend the time for payment of any  variable  product  consideration  or
accept payment of any past due variable product consideration.        

 8.  This   Agreement   shall  not  create  or  be   construed  as  creating  an
     Employer-Employee or Master-Servant  relationship between Broker/Dealer and
SBL.                                                                  

 9.  Broker/Dealer  agrees to keep accurate  records on all business written and
     moneys received under this  Agreement.  Such records may be examined by SBL
     or its  representatives  at any  reasonable  time. All moneys and documents
     belonging to SBL in possession of Broker/Dealer  shall be held in trust and
     shall  not be used or  commingled  with  funds  or  property  belonging  to
     Broker/Dealer and shall be promptly remitted to SBL.  Broker/Dealer  agrees
     to be  responsible  for any county or municipal  occupational  or privilege
     fee,  tax  or  license  which  may  be  required  of  Broker/Dealer  or its
 representatives as a result of business submitted under this Agreement.

10.  Neither this  Agreement nor the  compensation  payable  hereunder  shall be
     assigned or pledged  without the written  consent of SBL.  SBL reserves the
right to reject any assignment or pledge.                             

11.  No consent or change in this agreement  shall be binding upon SBL unless in
     writing and signed by the  president,  a vice  president,  secretary  or an
     assistant  secretary  of SBL.  Any  failure  of SBL to insist  upon  strict
     compliance with the provisions of this Agreement shall not constitute or be
construed as a waiver thereof.                                        

12.  SBL shall have the right to decline or modify any  application or to refund
     any  variable   product   consideration   or  any  portion   thereof,   and
     Broker/Dealer   shall  refund  immediately  upon  request  any  commissions
     received in connection  therewith.  All applications for variable  products
     are  subject  to  acceptance  by  SBL  and  become   effective   only  upon
     confirmation  by SBL.  Broker/Dealer  agrees to return to SBL without delay
     any commissions received on a variable product,  contract or policy if such
     contract or policy is tendered  for  redemption  within  seven (7) business
days after acceptance of the application by SBL.                      

13.  Variable products,  contracts and policies will be offered to the public at
     the  price  as  outlined  in  the  applicable  variable  product's  current
     prospectus.  All cash surrenders require the written request and consent of
     the  contract  or policy  owner and such  surrenders  will  conform  to the
provisions set forth in the applicable contract or policy.            

14.  SBL  has  been  and  is   designated   Administrative   Agent  of  Security
     Distributors,  Inc. to perform duties,  including recordkeeping and payment
     of  commissions,  necessary  under this  Agreement in  connection  with the
     solicitation,  sales and servicing of variable  annuity  contracts sold and
solicited hereunder.                                                  

15.  SBL reserves the right to amend or terminate this Agreement at any time. In
     the event Broker/Dealer ceases to be a member in good standing of the NASD,
     this  Agreement  shall  terminate   automatically   without  notice.  After
     termination Broker/Dealer upon request, shall without delay pay in full any
     indebtedness  owed to SBL and return all SBL property to their home office.
     In the event  Broker/Dealer  ceases  doing  business  in such  manner  that
     servicing  would be  impossible,  SBL  reserves  the right to reassign  the
     business and service fees to another  Broker/Dealer.  Should  Broker/Dealer
     fail to comply with any of the terms of this  Agreement,  SBL  reserves the
     right  to  terminate  this  Agreement  and  terminate  vesting  as  to  all
commissions payable thereunder.                                       

16.  This  Agreement is effective as of the  Effective  Date set forth above and
     replaces any previous  agreement  between the parties  relating to variable
products of SBL except as to any commissions payable thereunder.      

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed
as of the Effective Date set forth above.                                       

SECURITY DISTRIBUTORS, INC.                 BROKER/DEALER                       

By RICHARD K RYAN                                                               
   -----------------------------------      ------------------------------------
Title:  President                              (Signature of Principal)   

                                            ------------------------------------
SECURITY BENEFIT LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY             (Name of Principal)         

By RICHARD K RYAN                                                               
   -----------------------------------      ------------------------------------
Title:  Senior Vice President            Title:                           

                                            |_| Individual       |_| Corporation
                       |_| Partnership

                              Tax Identification No.
                                                                   -------------

P-->EX-99.B3BLast Page of 3TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 3rd
[SBL LOGO]                                                                      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
A Member of The Security                               700 SW Harrison St.      
Benefit Group of Companies                             Topeka, Kansas 66636-0001
                                            (785) 431-3000

                                                           SBL VARIABLE PRODUCTS
                                                             COMMISSION SCHEDULE

                                                            PCG VARIABLE ANNUITY

Broker/Dealer:____________________________                                      

Effective Date of Commission Schedule:                                          

This  Commission  Schedule  is hereby  made part of and amends the SBL  Variable
Products  Agreement  (the  "Agreement")  with  Security  Benefit Life  Insurance
Company and Security  Distributors,  Inc.  (hereinafter  jointly  called "SBL").
Except as otherwise defined herein,  all capitalized terms will have the meaning
set forth in the Agreement and the PCG Variable Annuity Contract.               

NONCOMMISSIONABLE                                                               

No  commissions  or  other  form  of  compensation  shall  be  paid  by  SBL  to
Broker/Dealer on sales of the PCG Variable Annuity Contract.                    

CHANGE OF  COMMISSION  SCHEDULE:  SBL  reserves  the right at any time,  with or
without notice, to change, modify or discontinue this Commission Schedule.      

CHANGE OF  DEALER:  A  Contractowner  shall  have the right to  designate  a new
broker/dealer,   or  to  terminate  a   broker/dealer   without   designating  a
replacement,  by sending  written  notice of such  designation or termination to
SBL.                                                                            

THIS  COMMISSION  SCHEDULE  replaces  any previous  Commission  Schedule for the
Variable Annuity Contract listed above as of the Effective Date set forth above.

SECURITY DISTRIBUTORS, INC.              SECURITY BENEFIT LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY

By:                                      By:                                    
       -----------------------------           ---------------------------------

Title:                                   Title:                                 
       -----------------------------            --------------------------------

↑TopFiling Submission 0001061034-98-000008   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Fri, 28 Jul 15:17:31.0 GMT 



 SBL VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT 1 (Form: N-30D, Received: 06/27/1997 16:27:26) 












VARIABLE ANNUITY




1996 ANNUAL REPORT




[SBL LOGO]


Security Benefit Life Insurance Company

A Member of The Security Benefit

Group of Companies






A LETTER FROM THE PRESIDENT



Security  Benefit is one  company  dedicated  to the  successful  mastery of our
mission:  MAINTAINING A STRONG FINANCIAL  POSITION AND CONSISTENT GROWTH FOR THE
PROTECTION AND SECURITY OF ALL OF OUR POLICYHOLDERS AND CUSTOMERS.  All of us at
Security  Benefit renew our  commitment to this mission every day. We want to be
the best and do our best for you. As a member of the Security Benefit team, I am
especially proud that mastering successful growth is an achievement we have come
to expect as a team.


It is my pleasure  to report  that 1996 was again a record  year of  outstanding
achievements for Security Benefit.


*  Sales surpassed 1995 results by 48%


*  Profits are up 18% over last year


*  Revenues and deposit funds exceeded 1995 results by 28%


*  Company assets rose 17% over 1995 figures


These  accomplishments  would just be facts on paper  without the efforts of the
people who work at Security Benefit. They are the heart of our company, and I am
proud to be part of their team.


My wish for 1997 is to have  another  record year for our  company.  Last year's
accomplishments  will be difficult to top but all of us at Security Benefit have
our  sights  and goals  set  high.  We are well  positioned  with new,  creative
products  designed in response to our customers'  changing  investment goals and
lifestyle  requirements.  We know  true  mastery  does  not  come  easily.  With
perseverance  and attention to constantly  improving  what we do best, I know we
can do it.



HOWARD R. FRICKE



Howard R. Fricke

Chairman of the Board

President and Chief Executive Officer


1








BOARD OF DIRECTORS




HOWARD R. FRICKE

CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, PRESIDENT & CEO


Security Benefit Life Insurance Company

Topeka, Kansas



THOMAS R. CLEVENGER


Wichita, Kansas



SISTER LORETTO MARIE COLWELL

PRESIDENT


St. Francis Hospital and Medical Center

Topeka, Kansas



JOHN C. DICUS

CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD


Capitol Federal Savings & Loan Association
Topeka, Kansas



MELANIE S. FANNIN

PRESIDENT


Kansas - Southwestern Bell Telephone

Topeka, Kansas



WILLIAM W. HANNA

PRESIDENT & CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER


Koch Industries

Wichita, Kansas



JOHN E. HAYES, JR.

CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, PRESIDENT & CEO


Western Resources, Inc.

Topeka, Kansas



LAIRD G. NOLLER

PRESIDENT


Noller Enterprises

Topeka, Kansas



FRANK SABATINI

CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD AND PRESIDENT


Capital City Bank

Topeka, Kansas



ROBERT C. WHEELER

PRESIDENT


Hill's Pet Nutrition, Inc.

Topeka, Kansas



NOTICE OF POLICYOWNERS' MEETING



We  encourage  you to attend the annual  meeting of  policyowners  to be held on
Tuesday,  June 3, 1997 at Security  Benefit Life,  700 SW Harrison St.,  Topeka,
Kansas,  at 2:00 p.m. Each policyowner is entitled to vote,  either in person or
by proxy,  on all matters coming before the meeting.  Proxies are available from
the  corporate  secretary  and must be  returned  at least 30 days  prior to the
annual meeting.


This report is submitted only for the general  information of  Security  Benefit
Life  Variable  Annuity  contractowners  and  participants and is not authorized
for distribution to the public.


For More Information Call

1-800-888-2461


www.securitybenefit.com


2









REPORT OF INDEPENDENT AUDITORS




THE CONTRACT OWNERS OF SBL VARIABLE ANNUITY







ACCOUNT AND THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF

SECURITY BENEFIT LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY



We have audited the  accompanying  balance sheet of SBL Variable Annuity Account
(the Company) as of December 31, 1996, and the related  statements of operations
and changes in net assets for the year then ended.  These  financial  statements
are the  responsibility of the Company's  management.  Our  responsibility is to
express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audit.


We conducted our audit in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards.
Those standards  require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable
assurance   about  whether  the  financial   statements  are  free  of  material
misstatement.  An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting
the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our procedures included
confirmation  of  investments  owned as of December 31, 1996, by  correspondence
with the custodian.  An audit also includes assessing the accounting  principles
used and  significant  estimates made by  management,  as well as evaluating the
overall financial statement  presentation.  We believe that our audit provides a
reasonable basis for our opinion.


In our opinion,  the financial  statements  referred to above present fairly, in
all material respects, the financial position of SBL Variable Annuity Account at
December  31,  1996,  and the results of its  operations  and changes in its net
assets for the year then ended in conformity with generally accepted  accounting
principles.



Ernst & Young LLP



February 7, 1997


3








SBL VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT




BALANCE SHEET



DECEMBER 31, 1996



ASSETS


(DOLLARS IN THOUSANDS)






Investments:

   Security Equity Fund (Series E) - 13,458,485 shares at
     net asset value of $7.20 per share (cost, $80,561)                $  96,901

   Security Growth and Income Fund (Series I) - 3,477,572
     shares at net asset value of $8.60 per share (cost, $25,694)         29,907

   Security Income Fund - Corporate Bond (Series B) - 715,357
     shares at net asset value of $6.87 per share (cost, $5,210)           4,915

   Security Ultra Fund (Series U) - 32,740 shares at net
     asset value of $7.62 per share (cost, $242)                             249

   Mortality guarantee receivable                                             65
                                                                ----------------
Total assets                                                            $132,037
                                                                ================

LIABILITIES AND NET ASSETS

Actuarial risk fees payable                                         $         20








Net assets are represented by (Note 3):








                            NUMBER
                           OF UNITS    UNIT VALUE       AMOUNT
                     ------------------------------------------
Series E:

  Accumulation units   12,915,768       $7.20          $92,994
  Annuity reserves        545,836        7.20            3,930         96,924
                                               ----------------
Series I:

  Accumulation units    3,288,510        8.60           28,281
  Annuity reserves        191,637        8.60            1,648         29,929
                                               ----------------
Series B:

  Accumulation units      696,330        6.87            4,784
  Annuity reserves         19,006        6.87              131          4,915
                                               ----------------
Series U:

  Accumulation units       32,388        7.62              247
  Annuity reserves            344        7.62                2            249
                                               ----------------    ----------








Total liabilities and net assets                                        $132,037




See accompanying notes.


4











SBL VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT




STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS AND CHANGES IN NET ASSETS




YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 1996



(IN THOUSANDS)






                          ------------------------------------------------------
                                SERIES E     SERIES I     SERIES B      SERIES U
                          ------------------------------------------------------

Dividend distributions          $   508       $  532       $  350       $  -

Mortality and expense
 risk fee (Note 2)                 (716)        (225)         (42)        (2)
                          ------------------------------------------------------
Net investment income (loss)       (208)         307          308         (2)

Capital gains distribution         8,029        2,276          -           18

Realized gain (loss) on
 investments                       4,490        1,040        (89)           -

Unrealized appreciation
 (depreciation) on investments     5,381        1,275       (295)          21
                          ------------------------------------------------------
Net realized and unrealized
 gain (loss) on investments       17,900        4,591       (384)          39
                          ------------------------------------------------------

Net increase (decrease) in
 net assets resulting from
 operations                       17,692        4,898        (76)          37

Net assets at beginning
 of year                          85,025       27,970      5,552          219

Variable annuity deposits
 (Notes 2 and 3)                   6,683        1,345        434            -

Terminations and withdrawals
 (Notes 2 and 3)                 (11,958)      (4,108)      (953)          (7)

Annuity payments
 (Notes 2 and 3)                    (562)        (228)       (42)           -

Net mortality guarantee transfer      44           52          -            -
                          ------------------------------------------------------

Net assets at end of year        $96,924      $29,929     $4,915         $249
                          ======================================================








5






SBL VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT






NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



DECEMBER 31, 1996


1.  ORGANIZATION AND SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES


ORGANIZATION  - SBL Variable  Annuity  Account  (the  Account) is a separate
account of Security  Benefit Life Insurance  Company  (SBL).  The Account is
registered as a unit  investment  trust under the Investment  Company Act of
1940, as amended. Deposits received by the Account are invested, as directed
by the owners,  in either  Security  Equity Fund (Series E), Security Growth
and Income Fund  (Series  I), the  Security  Income  Fund -  Corporate  Bond
(Series B) or Security Ultra Fund (Series U).


Under the terms of the investment advisory contracts,  portfolio investments
of the underlying mutual fund are made by Security Management Company,  LLC,
which  is  owned  50% by SBL and 50% by  Security  Benefit  Group,  Inc.,  a
wholly-owned subsidiary of SBL.


INVESTMENT  VALUATION - Investments in mutual fund shares are carried in the
balance  sheet at market  value (net asset  value of the  underlying  mutual
fund).  The first-in,  first-out cost method is used to determine  gains and
losses. Security transactions are accounted for on the trade date.


The cost of investments purchased and proceeds from investments sold  during
1996 were as follows (In Thousands):








                                          COST OF       PROCEEDS
                                         PURCHASES     FROM SALES
                                       -----------------------------
Security Equity Fund (Series E)           $15,895       $13,877

Security Growth and Income
   Fund (Series I)                          4,450         4,892

Security Income Fund -
   Corporate Bond (Series B)                  819         1,070

Security Ultra Fund (Series U)                 18             9








6





1.  ORGANIZATION AND SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (CONTINUED)


ANNUITY  RESERVES - Annuity  reserves  relate to contracts that have matured
and are in the payout  stage.  Such  reserves  are  computed on the basis of
published  mortality  tables using assumed  interest rates that will provide
reserves as prescribed by law. In cases where the payout option  selected is
life  contingent,   SBL  periodically   recalculates  the  required  annuity
reserves,  and any resulting adjustment is either charged or credited to SBL
and not to the Account.


REINVESTMENT OF DIVIDENDS - Dividend and capital gains distributions paid by
the mutual fund to the Account are  reinvested in additional  shares of each
respective  Series.  Dividend  income and capital  gains  distributions  are
recorded as income on the ex-dividend date.


FEDERAL  INCOME  TAXES - Under  current  law,  no federal  income  taxes are
payable with respect to the Account.


USE OF ESTIMATES - The  preparation  of financial  statements  in conformity
with generally accepted  accounting  principles  requires management to make
estimates and assumptions  that affect the amounts reported in the financial
statements and  accompanying  notes.  Actual results could differ from those
estimates.


2.  VARIABLE ANNUITY CONTRACT CHARGES


Mortality  and expense  risks  assumed by SBL are  compensated  for by a fee
equivalent to an annual rate of 0.795% of the asset value of each  contract,
of which 0.675% is for  assuming  mortality  risks and the  remainder is for
assuming expense risks.


When  applicable,  an amount for state premium taxes is deducted as provided
by pertinent  state law,  either from  purchase  payments or from the amount
applied to effect an annuity at the time annuity payments commence.


Contract  charges  retained  by SBL from the  proceeds  of sales of  annuity
contracts were not significant during 1996.


7






SBL VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT







NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



DECEMBER 31, 1996




3.  SUMMARY OF UNIT TRANSACTIONS (In Thousands)



UNITS









Series E:
  Variable annuity deposits                                      958
  Terminations, withdrawals, annuity payments
    and expense charges                                        1,811
  Dividends and capital gains distributions,
    net of expenses paid                                       1,091

Series I:
  Variable annuity deposits                                      171
  Terminations, withdrawals, annuity payments
    and expense charges                                          512
  Dividends and capital gains distributions,
    net of expenses paid                                         298

Series B:
  Variable annuity deposits                                       63
  Terminations, withdrawals, annuity payments
    and expense charges                                          143
  Dividends and capital gains distributions,
    net of expenses paid                                          44

Series U:
  Terminations, withdrawals, annuity payments
    and expense charges                                            1
  Dividends and capital gains distributions,
    net of expenses paid                                           2








8











[SBG LOGO]                                                          Bulk Rate
SECURITY BENEFIT GROUP OF COMPANIES                            U.S. Postage Paid
700 S.W. Harrison St., Topeka, Kansas 66636-0001                   Topeka, KS
                                                                 Permit No. 428















Annuity (American) - Wikipedia





















 






Annuity (American)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Annuity (disambiguation).





This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In the United States, an annuity is a contractually executed, relatively low-risk investment product, where the insured (usually, an individual) pays a life insurance company a lump-sum premium at the start of the contract. That money is to be paid back to the insured in fixed, incremental amounts, over some future period (predetermined by the insured). The insurer invests the premium; the resulting profit/return on investment funds the payments received by the insured and compensate the insurer. Conventional annuity contracts provide a predictable, guaranteed stream of future income (e.g., for retirement) until the death(s) of the beneficiaries(s) named in the contract, or, until a future termination date — whichever occurs first.[1]



Contents


1 History
2 General
3 Immediate annuity

3.1 Annuity with period certain
3.2 Life annuity

3.2.1 Life annuity variants




4 Deferred annuity

4.1 Features
4.2 Criticisms of deferred annuities


5 Taxation
6 Insurance company default risk and state guaranty associations
7 Compensation for advisors or salespeople
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
Although annuities have existed in their present form only for a few decades, the idea of paying out a stream of income to an individual or family dates back to the Roman Empire. The Latin word annua meant annual stipends, and during the reign of the emperors, the word signified a contract that made annual payments. Individuals would make a single large payment into the annua and then receive an annual payment each year until death, or for a specified period of time. The Roman speculator and jurist Gnaeus Domitius Annius Ulpianus is cited as one of the earliest dealers of these annuities, and he is also credited with creating the first actuarial life table. Roman soldiers were paid annuities as a form of compensation for military service. During the Middle Ages, annuities were used by feudal lords and kings to help cover the heavy costs of their constant wars and conflicts with each other. At this time, annuities were offered in the form of a tontine, or a large pool of cash from which payments were made to investors.[2]
One of the early recorded uses of annuities in the United States was by the Presbyterian Church in 1720. The purpose was to provide a secure retirement to aging ministers and their families, and was later expanded to assist widows and orphans. In 1912, Pennsylvania Company Insurance was among the first to begin offering annuities to the general public in the United States. Some prominent figures who are noted for their use of annuities include: Benjamin Franklin assisting the cities of Boston and Philadelphia; Babe Ruth avoiding losses during the great depression, O. J. Simpson protecting his income from lawsuits and creditors. Ben Bernanke in 2006 disclosed that his major financial assets are two annuities.[3]
General[edit]
Annuity contracts in the United States are defined by the Internal Revenue Code and regulated by the individual states. Variable annuities have features of both life insurance and investment products.[4] In the U.S., annuity insurance may be issued only by life insurance companies, although private annuity contracts may be arranged between donors to non-profits to reduce taxes. Insurance companies are regulated by the states, so contracts or options that may be available in some states may not be available in others. Their federal tax treatment, however, is governed by the Internal Revenue Code. Variable annuities are regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission and the sale of variable annuities is overseen by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) (the largest non-governmental regulator for all securities firms doing business in the United States).
There are two possible phases for an annuity, one phase in which the customer deposits and accumulates money into an account (the deferral phase), and another phase in which customers receive payments for some period of time (the annuity or income phase). During this latter phase, the insurance company makes income payments that may be set for a stated period of time, such as five years, or continue until the death of the customer(s) (the "annuitant(s)") named in the contract. Annuitization over a lifetime can have a death benefit guarantee over a certain period of time, such as ten years. Annuity contracts with a deferral phase always have an annuity phase and are called deferred annuities. An annuity contract may also be structured so that it has only the annuity phase; such a contract is called an immediate annuity. Note this is not always the case.
Immediate annuity[edit]
The term "annuity," as used in financial theory, is most closely related to what is today called an immediate annuity. This is an insurance policy which, in exchange for a sum of money, guarantees that the issuer will make a series of payments. These payments may be either level or increasing periodic payments for a fixed term of years or until the ending of a life or two lives, or even whichever is longer. It is also possible to structure the payments under an immediate annuity so that they vary with the performance of a specified set of investments, usually bond and equity mutual funds. Such a contract is called a variable immediate annuity. See also life annuity, below.
The overarching characteristic of the immediate annuity is that it is a vehicle for distributing savings with a tax-deferred growth factor. A common use for an immediate annuity might be to provide a pension income. In the U.S., the tax treatment of a non-qualified immediate annuity is that every payment is a combination of a return of principal (which part is not taxed) and income (which is taxed at ordinary income rates, not capital gain rates). Immediate annuities funded as an IRA do not have any tax advantages, but typically the distribution satisfies the IRS RMD requirement and may satisfy the RMD requirement for other IRA accounts of the owner (see IRS Sec 1.401(a)(9)-6.)
When a deferred annuity is annuitized, it works like an immediate annuity from that point on, but with a lower cost basis and thus more of the payment is taxed.
Annuity with period certain[edit]
This type of immediate annuity pays the annuitant for a designated number of years (i.e., a period certain) and is used to fund a need that will end when the period is up (for example, it might be used to fund the premiums for a term life insurance policy). Thus the person may outlive the number of years the annuity will pay.
Life annuity[edit]
Main article: Life annuity
A life or lifetime immediate annuity is used to provide an income for the life of the annuitant similar to a defined benefit or pension plan.
A life annuity works somewhat like a loan that is made by the purchaser (contract owner) to the issuing (insurance) company, which pays back the original capital or principal (which isn't taxed) with interest and/or gains (which is taxed as ordinary income) to the annuitant on whose life the annuity is based. The assumed period of the loan is based on the life expectancy of the annuitant. In order to guarantee that the income continues for life, the insurance company relies on a concept called cross-subsidy or the "law of large numbers". Because an annuity population can be expected to have a distribution of lifespans around the population's mean (average) age, those dying earlier will give up income to support those living longer whose money would otherwise run out. Thus it is a form of longevity insurance (see also below).
A life annuity, ideally, can reduce the "problem" faced by a person when they don't know how long they will live, and so they don't know the optimal speed at which to spend their savings. Life annuities with payments indexed to the Consumer Price Index might be an acceptable solution to this problem, but there is only a thin market for them in North America.
Life annuity variants[edit]
For an additional expense (either by way of an increase in payments (premium) or a decrease in benefits), an annuity or benefit rider can be purchased on another life such as a spouse, family member or friend for the duration of whose life the annuity is wholly or partly guaranteed. For example, it is common to buy an annuity which will continue to pay out to the spouse of the annuitant after death, for so long as the spouse survives. The annuity paid to the spouse is called a reversionary annuity or survivorship annuity. However, if the annuitant is in good health, it may be more advantageous to select the higher payout option on his or her life only and purchase a life insurance policy that would pay income to the survivor.
The pure life annuity can have harsh consequences for the annuitant who dies before recovering his or her investment in the contract. Such a situation, called a forfeiture, can be mitigated by the addition of a period-certain feature under which the annuity issuer is required to make annuity payments for at least a certain number of years; if the annuitant outlives the specified period certain, annuity payments continue until the annuitant's death, and if the annuitant dies before the expiration of the period certain, the annuitant's estate or beneficiary is entitled to the remaining payments certain. The tradeoff between the pure life annuity and the life-with-period-certain annuity is that the annuity payment for the latter is smaller. A viable alternative to the life-with-period-certain annuity is to purchase a single-premium life policy that would cover the lost premium in the annuity.
Impaired-life annuities for smokers or those with a particular illness are also available from some insurance companies. Since the life expectancy is reduced, the annual payment to the purchaser is raised.
Life annuities are priced based on the probability of the annuitant surviving to receive the payments. Longevity insurance is a form of annuity that defers commencement of the payments until very late in life. A common longevity contract would be purchased at or before retirement but would not commence payments until 20 years after retirement. If the nominee dies before payments commence there is no payable benefit. This drastically reduces the cost of the annuity while still providing protection against outliving one's resources.
Deferred annuity[edit]
The second usage for the term annuity came into being during the 1970s. Such a contract is more properly referred to as a deferred annuity and is chiefly a vehicle for accumulating savings with a view to eventually distributing them either in the manner of an immediate annuity or as a lump-sum payment.
All varieties of deferred annuities owned by individuals have one thing in common: any increase in account values is not taxed until those gains are withdrawn. This is also known as tax-deferred growth.
A deferred annuity which grows by interest rate earnings alone is called a fixed deferred annuity (FA). A deferred annuity that permits allocations to stock or bond funds and for which the account value is not guaranteed to stay above the initial amount invested is called a variable annuity (VA).
A new category of deferred annuity, called the fixed indexed annuity (FIA) emerged in 1995 (originally called an Equity-Indexed Annuity).[5] Fixed indexed annuities may have features of both fixed and variable deferred annuities. The insurance company typically guarantees a minimum return for EIA. An investor can still lose money if he or she cancels (or surrenders) the policy early, before a "break even" period. An oversimplified expression of a typical EIA's rate of return might be that it is equal to a stated "participation rate" multiplied by a target stock market index's performance excluding dividends. Interest rate caps or an administrative fee may be applicable.
Deferred annuities in the United States have the advantage that taxation of all capital gains and ordinary income is deferred until withdrawn. In theory, such tax-deferred compounding allows more money to be put to work while the savings are accumulating, leading to higher returns. A disadvantage, however, is that when amounts held under a deferred annuity are withdrawn or inherited, the interest/gains are immediately taxed as ordinary income.
Features[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


A variety of features and guarantees have been developed by insurance companies in order to make annuity products more attractive. These include death and living benefit options, extra credit options, account guarantees, spousal continuation benefits, reduced contingent deferred sales charges (or surrender charges), and various combinations thereof. Each feature or benefit added to a contract will typically be accompanied by an additional expense either directly (billed to client) or indirectly (inside product).
Deferred annuities are usually divided into two different kinds:

Fixed annuities offer some sort of guaranteed rate of return over the life of the contract. In general such contracts are often positioned to be somewhat like bank CDs and offer a rate of return competitive with those of CDs of similar time frames. Many fixed annuities, however, do not have a fixed rate of return over the life of the contract, offering instead a guaranteed minimum rate and a first year introductory rate. The rate after the first year is often an amount that may be set at the insurance company's discretion subject, however, to the minimum amount (typically 3%). There are usually some provisions in the contract to allow a percentage of the interest and/or principal to be withdrawn early and without penalty (usually the interest earned in a 12-month period or 10%), unlike most CDs. Fixed annuities normally become fully liquid depending on the surrender schedule or upon the owner's death. Most equity index annuities are properly categorized as fixed annuities and their performance is typically tied to a stock market index (usually the S&P 500 or the Dow Jones Industrial Average). These products are guaranteed but are not as easy to understand as standard fixed annuities as there are usually caps, spreads, margins, and crediting methods that can reduce returns. These products also don't pay any of the participating market indices' dividends; the trade-off is that contract holder can never earn less than 0% in a negative year.
Variable annuities allow money to be invested in insurance company "separate accounts" (which are sometimes referred to as "subaccounts" and in any case are functionally similar to mutual funds) in a tax-deferred manner.[6] Their primary use is to allow an investor to engage in tax-deferred investing for retirement in amounts greater than permitted by individual retirement or 401(k) plans. In addition, many variable annuity contracts offer a guaranteed minimum rate of return (either for a future withdrawal and/or in the case of the owner's death), even if the underlying separate account investments perform poorly. This can be attractive to people uncomfortable investing in the equity markets without the guarantees. Of course, an investor will pay for each benefit provided by a variable annuity, since insurance companies must charge a premium to cover the insurance guarantees of such benefits. Variable annuities are regulated both by the individual states (as insurance products) and by the Securities and Exchange Commission (as securities under the federal securities laws). The SEC requires that all of the charges under variable annuities be described in great detail in the prospectus that is offered to each variable annuity customer. Of course, potential customers should review these charges carefully, just as one would in purchasing mutual fund shares. People who sell variable annuities are usually regulated by FINRA, whose rules of conduct require a careful analysis of the suitability of variable annuities (and other securities products) to those to whom they recommend such products. These products are often criticized as being sold to the wrong persons, who could have done better investing in a more suitable alternative, since the commissions paid under this product are often high relative to other investment products.

There are several types of performance guarantees, and one may often choose them à la carte, with higher risk charges for guarantees that are riskier for the insurance companies. The first type is a guaranteed minimum death benefit (GMDB), which can be received only if the owner of the annuity contract, or the covered annuitant, dies.
GMDBs come in various flavors, in order of increasing risk to the insurance company:

Return of premium (a guarantee that you will not have a negative return)
Roll-up of premium at a particular rate (a guarantee that you will achieve a minimum rate of return, greater than 0)
Maximum anniversary value (looks back at account value on the anniversaries, and guarantees you will get at least as much as the highest values upon death)
Greater of maximum anniversary value or particular roll-up

Insurance companies provide even greater insurance coverage on guaranteed living benefits, which tend to be elective. Unlike death benefits, which the contractholder generally cannot time, living benefits pose significant risk for insurance companies as contractholders will likely exercise these benefits when they are worth the most. Annuities with guaranteed living benefits (GLBs) tend to have high fees commensurate with the additional risks underwritten by the issuing insurer.
Some GLB examples, in no particular order:

Guaranteed minimum income benefit (GMIB, a guarantee that one will get a minimum income stream upon annuitization at a particular point in the future)
Guaranteed minimum accumulation lbenefit (GMAB, a guarantee that the account value will be at a certain amount at a certain point in the future)
Guaranteed minimum withdrawal benefit (GMWB, a guarantee similar to the income benefit, but one that doesn't require annuitizing)
Guaranteed-for-life income benefit (a guarantee similar to a withdrawal benefit, where withdrawals begin and continue until cash value becomes zero, withdrawals stop when cash value is zero and then annuitization occurs on the guaranteed benefit amount for a payment amount that is not determined until annuitization date.)

Recently, insurance companies developed asset-transfer programs that operate at the contract level or the fund level. In the former, a percentage of client's account value will be transferred to a designated low-risk fund when the contract has poor investment performance. On the fund level, certain investment options have a target volatility built within the fund (usually about 10%) and will re-balance to maintain that target. In both cases, they are stated to help buffer poor investment performance until markets perform better (where they will transition back to normal allocations to catch an upswing). However, there are criticisms of these programs including, but not limited to, often mandating these programs on clients, restricting flexibility of investing, and not catching the upswing of markets fast enough due to the underlying design of such programs.
Be careful in regard to using GLB riders in non-qualified contracts as most of the products in the annuity marketplace today create a 100% taxable income benefit whereas income generated from an immediate annuity in a non-qualified contract would partially be a return of principal and therefore non-taxable.
Criticisms of deferred annuities[edit]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Some annuities do not have any deferred surrender charges and do not pay the financial professional a commission, although the financial professional may charge a fee for his or her advice. These contracts are called "no-load" variable annuity products and are usually available from a fee-based financial planner or directly from a no-load mutual fund company. Of course various charges are still imposed on these contracts, but they are less than those sold by commissioned brokers. It is important that potential purchasers of annuities, mutual funds, tax-exempt municipal bonds, commodities futures, interest rate swaps, in short, any financial instrument understand the fees on the product and the fees a financial planner may charge.
Variable annuities are controversial because many believe the extra fees (i.e., the fees above and beyond those charged for similar retail mutual funds that offer no principal protection or guarantees of any kind) may reduce the rate of return compared to what the investor could make by investing directly in similar investments outside of the variable annuity. A big selling point for variable annuities is the guarantees many have, such as the guarantee that the customer will not lose his or her principal. Critics say that these guarantees are not necessary because over the long term the market has always been positive, while others say that with the uncertainty of the financial markets many investors simply will not invest without guarantees.[who?] Past returns are no guarantee of future performance, of course, and different investors have different risk tolerances, different investment horizons, different family situations, and so on. The sale of any security product should involve a careful analysis of the suitability of the product for a given individual.
Taxation[edit]
In the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, the growth of the annuity value during the accumulation phase is tax-deferred, that is, not subject to current income tax, for annuities owned by individuals. The tax deferred status of deferred annuities has led to their common usage in the United States. Under the U.S. tax code, the benefits from annuity contracts do not always have to be taken in the form of a fixed stream of payments (annuitization), and many annuity contracts are bought primarily for the tax benefits rather than to receive a fixed stream of income. If an annuity is used in a qualified pension plan or an IRA funding vehicle, then 100% of the annuity payment is taxable as current income upon distribution (because the taxpayer has no tax basis in any of the money in the annuity). It should be noted this is the same tax treatment of direct participation in a qualified pension plan (such as a 401K), again, due to the fact the taxpayer has no tax basis in any of the money in the plan. If the annuity contract is purchased with after-tax dollars, then the contract holder upon annuitization recovers his basis pro-rata in the ratio of basis divided by the expected value, according to the tax regulation Section 1.72-5. (This is commonly referred to as the exclusion ratio.) After the taxpayer has recovered all of his basis, then 100% of the payments thereafter are subject to ordinary income tax.
Since the Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2003, the use of variable annuities as a tax shelter has greatly diminished, because the growth of mutual funds and now most of the dividends of the fund are taxed at long term capital gains rates. This taxation, contrasted with the taxation of all the growth of variable annuities at income rates, means that in most cases, variable annuities shouldn't be used for tax shelters unless very long holding periods apply (for example, more than 20 years).
Insurance company default risk and state guaranty associations[edit]
Main article: Guaranty association
An investor should consider the financial strength of the insurance company that writes annuity contracts. Major insolvencies have occurred at least 62 times since the conspicuous collapse of the Executive Life Insurance Company in 1991.[1]
Insurance company defaults are governed by state law. The laws are, however, broadly similar in most states. Annuity contracts are protected against insurance company insolvency up to a specific dollar limit, often $100,000, but as high as $500,000 in New York [2], New Jersey [3], and the state of Washington [4]. California is the only state that has a limit less than 100%; the limit is 80% up to $300,000.[7] This protection is not insurance and is not provided by a government agency. It is provided by an entity called the state guaranty association. When an insolvency occurs, the guaranty association steps in to protect annuity holders, and decides what to do on a case-by-case basis. Sometimes the contracts will be taken over and fulfilled by a solvent insurance company.
The state guaranty association is not a government agency, but states usually require insurance companies to belong to it as a condition of being licensed to do business. The guaranty associations of the fifty states are members of a national umbrella association, the National Organization of Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Associations (NOLHGA). The NOLHGA website provides a description of the organization, links to websites for the individual state organizations, and links to the actual text of the governing state laws.
A difference between guaranty association protection and the protection of bank accounts by the FDIC, credit union accounts by the NCUA, and brokerage accounts by the SIPC, is that it is difficult for consumers to learn about this protection. Usually, state law prohibits insurance agents and companies from using the guaranty association in any advertising and agents are prohibited by statute from using this Web site or the existence of the guaranty association as an inducement to purchase insurance(e.g., [5]). Presumably, this is a response to concerns by stronger insurance companies about moral hazard.
Compensation for advisors or salespeople[edit]
Deferred annuities, including fixed, fixed indexed and variable, typically pay the advisor or salesperson 1 percent to 10 percent of the amount invested as a commission, with possible trail options of 25 basis points to 1 percent. Sometimes the advisor can select his payout option, which might be either 7 or 10 percent up front, or 5 percent up front with a 25 basis point trail, or 1 percent to 3 percent up front with a 1 percent trail. Trail commissions are most common in variable annuities while fixed annuities and fixed indexed annuities typically pay an up front commission.
Some firms allow an investor to pick an annuity share class, which determines the salesperson's commission schedule. The main variables are the up-front commission and the trail commission.
Fixed and Indexed Annuity commissions are paid to the agent by the insurance companies the agent represents. Commissions are not paid by the client (annuitant).
"No-load" variable annuities are available on a direct-to-consumer basis from several no-load mutual fund companies. "No-load" means the products have no sales commissions or surrender charges.
References[edit]

^ "Annuity Definition". Annuity.com. Retrieved 2012-11-14. .
^ Mark P. Cussen, CFP®, CMFC, AFC. "Introduction To Annuities: The History Of Annuities". Investopedia. Retrieved February 28, 2015. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ "The History of Annuities". Annuity Guys®. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ "SEC.gov - Annuities". sec.gov. April 6, 2011. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ US SEC Answers on Equity-Indexed Annuities Archived February 9, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "SEC.gov - Variable Annuities: What You Should Know". sec.gov. April 18, 2011. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ "State Guarantee Funds". annuityadvantage.com. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 


External links[edit]

National Association of Insurance Commissioners
The National Association for Fixed Annuities





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Annuity_(American)&oldid=770918367"					
Categories: Insurance in the United StatesUnited States contract lawAnnuitiesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Uses authors parameterWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from February 2015Articles needing additional references from March 2012All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2012 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Español 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 March 2017, at 12:11.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Annuity (American) - Wikipedia





















 






Annuity (American)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Annuity (disambiguation).





This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In the United States, an annuity is a contractually executed, relatively low-risk investment product, where the insured (usually, an individual) pays a life insurance company a lump-sum premium at the start of the contract. That money is to be paid back to the insured in fixed, incremental amounts, over some future period (predetermined by the insured). The insurer invests the premium; the resulting profit/return on investment funds the payments received by the insured and compensate the insurer. Conventional annuity contracts provide a predictable, guaranteed stream of future income (e.g., for retirement) until the death(s) of the beneficiaries(s) named in the contract, or, until a future termination date — whichever occurs first.[1]



Contents


1 History
2 General
3 Immediate annuity

3.1 Annuity with period certain
3.2 Life annuity

3.2.1 Life annuity variants




4 Deferred annuity

4.1 Features
4.2 Criticisms of deferred annuities


5 Taxation
6 Insurance company default risk and state guaranty associations
7 Compensation for advisors or salespeople
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
Although annuities have existed in their present form only for a few decades, the idea of paying out a stream of income to an individual or family dates back to the Roman Empire. The Latin word annua meant annual stipends, and during the reign of the emperors, the word signified a contract that made annual payments. Individuals would make a single large payment into the annua and then receive an annual payment each year until death, or for a specified period of time. The Roman speculator and jurist Gnaeus Domitius Annius Ulpianus is cited as one of the earliest dealers of these annuities, and he is also credited with creating the first actuarial life table. Roman soldiers were paid annuities as a form of compensation for military service. During the Middle Ages, annuities were used by feudal lords and kings to help cover the heavy costs of their constant wars and conflicts with each other. At this time, annuities were offered in the form of a tontine, or a large pool of cash from which payments were made to investors.[2]
One of the early recorded uses of annuities in the United States was by the Presbyterian Church in 1720. The purpose was to provide a secure retirement to aging ministers and their families, and was later expanded to assist widows and orphans. In 1912, Pennsylvania Company Insurance was among the first to begin offering annuities to the general public in the United States. Some prominent figures who are noted for their use of annuities include: Benjamin Franklin assisting the cities of Boston and Philadelphia; Babe Ruth avoiding losses during the great depression, O. J. Simpson protecting his income from lawsuits and creditors. Ben Bernanke in 2006 disclosed that his major financial assets are two annuities.[3]
General[edit]
Annuity contracts in the United States are defined by the Internal Revenue Code and regulated by the individual states. Variable annuities have features of both life insurance and investment products.[4] In the U.S., annuity insurance may be issued only by life insurance companies, although private annuity contracts may be arranged between donors to non-profits to reduce taxes. Insurance companies are regulated by the states, so contracts or options that may be available in some states may not be available in others. Their federal tax treatment, however, is governed by the Internal Revenue Code. Variable annuities are regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission and the sale of variable annuities is overseen by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) (the largest non-governmental regulator for all securities firms doing business in the United States).
There are two possible phases for an annuity, one phase in which the customer deposits and accumulates money into an account (the deferral phase), and another phase in which customers receive payments for some period of time (the annuity or income phase). During this latter phase, the insurance company makes income payments that may be set for a stated period of time, such as five years, or continue until the death of the customer(s) (the "annuitant(s)") named in the contract. Annuitization over a lifetime can have a death benefit guarantee over a certain period of time, such as ten years. Annuity contracts with a deferral phase always have an annuity phase and are called deferred annuities. An annuity contract may also be structured so that it has only the annuity phase; such a contract is called an immediate annuity. Note this is not always the case.
Immediate annuity[edit]
The term "annuity," as used in financial theory, is most closely related to what is today called an immediate annuity. This is an insurance policy which, in exchange for a sum of money, guarantees that the issuer will make a series of payments. These payments may be either level or increasing periodic payments for a fixed term of years or until the ending of a life or two lives, or even whichever is longer. It is also possible to structure the payments under an immediate annuity so that they vary with the performance of a specified set of investments, usually bond and equity mutual funds. Such a contract is called a variable immediate annuity. See also life annuity, below.
The overarching characteristic of the immediate annuity is that it is a vehicle for distributing savings with a tax-deferred growth factor. A common use for an immediate annuity might be to provide a pension income. In the U.S., the tax treatment of a non-qualified immediate annuity is that every payment is a combination of a return of principal (which part is not taxed) and income (which is taxed at ordinary income rates, not capital gain rates). Immediate annuities funded as an IRA do not have any tax advantages, but typically the distribution satisfies the IRS RMD requirement and may satisfy the RMD requirement for other IRA accounts of the owner (see IRS Sec 1.401(a)(9)-6.)
When a deferred annuity is annuitized, it works like an immediate annuity from that point on, but with a lower cost basis and thus more of the payment is taxed.
Annuity with period certain[edit]
This type of immediate annuity pays the annuitant for a designated number of years (i.e., a period certain) and is used to fund a need that will end when the period is up (for example, it might be used to fund the premiums for a term life insurance policy). Thus the person may outlive the number of years the annuity will pay.
Life annuity[edit]
Main article: Life annuity
A life or lifetime immediate annuity is used to provide an income for the life of the annuitant similar to a defined benefit or pension plan.
A life annuity works somewhat like a loan that is made by the purchaser (contract owner) to the issuing (insurance) company, which pays back the original capital or principal (which isn't taxed) with interest and/or gains (which is taxed as ordinary income) to the annuitant on whose life the annuity is based. The assumed period of the loan is based on the life expectancy of the annuitant. In order to guarantee that the income continues for life, the insurance company relies on a concept called cross-subsidy or the "law of large numbers". Because an annuity population can be expected to have a distribution of lifespans around the population's mean (average) age, those dying earlier will give up income to support those living longer whose money would otherwise run out. Thus it is a form of longevity insurance (see also below).
A life annuity, ideally, can reduce the "problem" faced by a person when they don't know how long they will live, and so they don't know the optimal speed at which to spend their savings. Life annuities with payments indexed to the Consumer Price Index might be an acceptable solution to this problem, but there is only a thin market for them in North America.
Life annuity variants[edit]
For an additional expense (either by way of an increase in payments (premium) or a decrease in benefits), an annuity or benefit rider can be purchased on another life such as a spouse, family member or friend for the duration of whose life the annuity is wholly or partly guaranteed. For example, it is common to buy an annuity which will continue to pay out to the spouse of the annuitant after death, for so long as the spouse survives. The annuity paid to the spouse is called a reversionary annuity or survivorship annuity. However, if the annuitant is in good health, it may be more advantageous to select the higher payout option on his or her life only and purchase a life insurance policy that would pay income to the survivor.
The pure life annuity can have harsh consequences for the annuitant who dies before recovering his or her investment in the contract. Such a situation, called a forfeiture, can be mitigated by the addition of a period-certain feature under which the annuity issuer is required to make annuity payments for at least a certain number of years; if the annuitant outlives the specified period certain, annuity payments continue until the annuitant's death, and if the annuitant dies before the expiration of the period certain, the annuitant's estate or beneficiary is entitled to the remaining payments certain. The tradeoff between the pure life annuity and the life-with-period-certain annuity is that the annuity payment for the latter is smaller. A viable alternative to the life-with-period-certain annuity is to purchase a single-premium life policy that would cover the lost premium in the annuity.
Impaired-life annuities for smokers or those with a particular illness are also available from some insurance companies. Since the life expectancy is reduced, the annual payment to the purchaser is raised.
Life annuities are priced based on the probability of the annuitant surviving to receive the payments. Longevity insurance is a form of annuity that defers commencement of the payments until very late in life. A common longevity contract would be purchased at or before retirement but would not commence payments until 20 years after retirement. If the nominee dies before payments commence there is no payable benefit. This drastically reduces the cost of the annuity while still providing protection against outliving one's resources.
Deferred annuity[edit]
The second usage for the term annuity came into being during the 1970s. Such a contract is more properly referred to as a deferred annuity and is chiefly a vehicle for accumulating savings with a view to eventually distributing them either in the manner of an immediate annuity or as a lump-sum payment.
All varieties of deferred annuities owned by individuals have one thing in common: any increase in account values is not taxed until those gains are withdrawn. This is also known as tax-deferred growth.
A deferred annuity which grows by interest rate earnings alone is called a fixed deferred annuity (FA). A deferred annuity that permits allocations to stock or bond funds and for which the account value is not guaranteed to stay above the initial amount invested is called a variable annuity (VA).
A new category of deferred annuity, called the fixed indexed annuity (FIA) emerged in 1995 (originally called an Equity-Indexed Annuity).[5] Fixed indexed annuities may have features of both fixed and variable deferred annuities. The insurance company typically guarantees a minimum return for EIA. An investor can still lose money if he or she cancels (or surrenders) the policy early, before a "break even" period. An oversimplified expression of a typical EIA's rate of return might be that it is equal to a stated "participation rate" multiplied by a target stock market index's performance excluding dividends. Interest rate caps or an administrative fee may be applicable.
Deferred annuities in the United States have the advantage that taxation of all capital gains and ordinary income is deferred until withdrawn. In theory, such tax-deferred compounding allows more money to be put to work while the savings are accumulating, leading to higher returns. A disadvantage, however, is that when amounts held under a deferred annuity are withdrawn or inherited, the interest/gains are immediately taxed as ordinary income.
Features[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


A variety of features and guarantees have been developed by insurance companies in order to make annuity products more attractive. These include death and living benefit options, extra credit options, account guarantees, spousal continuation benefits, reduced contingent deferred sales charges (or surrender charges), and various combinations thereof. Each feature or benefit added to a contract will typically be accompanied by an additional expense either directly (billed to client) or indirectly (inside product).
Deferred annuities are usually divided into two different kinds:

Fixed annuities offer some sort of guaranteed rate of return over the life of the contract. In general such contracts are often positioned to be somewhat like bank CDs and offer a rate of return competitive with those of CDs of similar time frames. Many fixed annuities, however, do not have a fixed rate of return over the life of the contract, offering instead a guaranteed minimum rate and a first year introductory rate. The rate after the first year is often an amount that may be set at the insurance company's discretion subject, however, to the minimum amount (typically 3%). There are usually some provisions in the contract to allow a percentage of the interest and/or principal to be withdrawn early and without penalty (usually the interest earned in a 12-month period or 10%), unlike most CDs. Fixed annuities normally become fully liquid depending on the surrender schedule or upon the owner's death. Most equity index annuities are properly categorized as fixed annuities and their performance is typically tied to a stock market index (usually the S&P 500 or the Dow Jones Industrial Average). These products are guaranteed but are not as easy to understand as standard fixed annuities as there are usually caps, spreads, margins, and crediting methods that can reduce returns. These products also don't pay any of the participating market indices' dividends; the trade-off is that contract holder can never earn less than 0% in a negative year.
Variable annuities allow money to be invested in insurance company "separate accounts" (which are sometimes referred to as "subaccounts" and in any case are functionally similar to mutual funds) in a tax-deferred manner.[6] Their primary use is to allow an investor to engage in tax-deferred investing for retirement in amounts greater than permitted by individual retirement or 401(k) plans. In addition, many variable annuity contracts offer a guaranteed minimum rate of return (either for a future withdrawal and/or in the case of the owner's death), even if the underlying separate account investments perform poorly. This can be attractive to people uncomfortable investing in the equity markets without the guarantees. Of course, an investor will pay for each benefit provided by a variable annuity, since insurance companies must charge a premium to cover the insurance guarantees of such benefits. Variable annuities are regulated both by the individual states (as insurance products) and by the Securities and Exchange Commission (as securities under the federal securities laws). The SEC requires that all of the charges under variable annuities be described in great detail in the prospectus that is offered to each variable annuity customer. Of course, potential customers should review these charges carefully, just as one would in purchasing mutual fund shares. People who sell variable annuities are usually regulated by FINRA, whose rules of conduct require a careful analysis of the suitability of variable annuities (and other securities products) to those to whom they recommend such products. These products are often criticized as being sold to the wrong persons, who could have done better investing in a more suitable alternative, since the commissions paid under this product are often high relative to other investment products.

There are several types of performance guarantees, and one may often choose them à la carte, with higher risk charges for guarantees that are riskier for the insurance companies. The first type is a guaranteed minimum death benefit (GMDB), which can be received only if the owner of the annuity contract, or the covered annuitant, dies.
GMDBs come in various flavors, in order of increasing risk to the insurance company:

Return of premium (a guarantee that you will not have a negative return)
Roll-up of premium at a particular rate (a guarantee that you will achieve a minimum rate of return, greater than 0)
Maximum anniversary value (looks back at account value on the anniversaries, and guarantees you will get at least as much as the highest values upon death)
Greater of maximum anniversary value or particular roll-up

Insurance companies provide even greater insurance coverage on guaranteed living benefits, which tend to be elective. Unlike death benefits, which the contractholder generally cannot time, living benefits pose significant risk for insurance companies as contractholders will likely exercise these benefits when they are worth the most. Annuities with guaranteed living benefits (GLBs) tend to have high fees commensurate with the additional risks underwritten by the issuing insurer.
Some GLB examples, in no particular order:

Guaranteed minimum income benefit (GMIB, a guarantee that one will get a minimum income stream upon annuitization at a particular point in the future)
Guaranteed minimum accumulation lbenefit (GMAB, a guarantee that the account value will be at a certain amount at a certain point in the future)
Guaranteed minimum withdrawal benefit (GMWB, a guarantee similar to the income benefit, but one that doesn't require annuitizing)
Guaranteed-for-life income benefit (a guarantee similar to a withdrawal benefit, where withdrawals begin and continue until cash value becomes zero, withdrawals stop when cash value is zero and then annuitization occurs on the guaranteed benefit amount for a payment amount that is not determined until annuitization date.)

Recently, insurance companies developed asset-transfer programs that operate at the contract level or the fund level. In the former, a percentage of client's account value will be transferred to a designated low-risk fund when the contract has poor investment performance. On the fund level, certain investment options have a target volatility built within the fund (usually about 10%) and will re-balance to maintain that target. In both cases, they are stated to help buffer poor investment performance until markets perform better (where they will transition back to normal allocations to catch an upswing). However, there are criticisms of these programs including, but not limited to, often mandating these programs on clients, restricting flexibility of investing, and not catching the upswing of markets fast enough due to the underlying design of such programs.
Be careful in regard to using GLB riders in non-qualified contracts as most of the products in the annuity marketplace today create a 100% taxable income benefit whereas income generated from an immediate annuity in a non-qualified contract would partially be a return of principal and therefore non-taxable.
Criticisms of deferred annuities[edit]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Some annuities do not have any deferred surrender charges and do not pay the financial professional a commission, although the financial professional may charge a fee for his or her advice. These contracts are called "no-load" variable annuity products and are usually available from a fee-based financial planner or directly from a no-load mutual fund company. Of course various charges are still imposed on these contracts, but they are less than those sold by commissioned brokers. It is important that potential purchasers of annuities, mutual funds, tax-exempt municipal bonds, commodities futures, interest rate swaps, in short, any financial instrument understand the fees on the product and the fees a financial planner may charge.
Variable annuities are controversial because many believe the extra fees (i.e., the fees above and beyond those charged for similar retail mutual funds that offer no principal protection or guarantees of any kind) may reduce the rate of return compared to what the investor could make by investing directly in similar investments outside of the variable annuity. A big selling point for variable annuities is the guarantees many have, such as the guarantee that the customer will not lose his or her principal. Critics say that these guarantees are not necessary because over the long term the market has always been positive, while others say that with the uncertainty of the financial markets many investors simply will not invest without guarantees.[who?] Past returns are no guarantee of future performance, of course, and different investors have different risk tolerances, different investment horizons, different family situations, and so on. The sale of any security product should involve a careful analysis of the suitability of the product for a given individual.
Taxation[edit]
In the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, the growth of the annuity value during the accumulation phase is tax-deferred, that is, not subject to current income tax, for annuities owned by individuals. The tax deferred status of deferred annuities has led to their common usage in the United States. Under the U.S. tax code, the benefits from annuity contracts do not always have to be taken in the form of a fixed stream of payments (annuitization), and many annuity contracts are bought primarily for the tax benefits rather than to receive a fixed stream of income. If an annuity is used in a qualified pension plan or an IRA funding vehicle, then 100% of the annuity payment is taxable as current income upon distribution (because the taxpayer has no tax basis in any of the money in the annuity). It should be noted this is the same tax treatment of direct participation in a qualified pension plan (such as a 401K), again, due to the fact the taxpayer has no tax basis in any of the money in the plan. If the annuity contract is purchased with after-tax dollars, then the contract holder upon annuitization recovers his basis pro-rata in the ratio of basis divided by the expected value, according to the tax regulation Section 1.72-5. (This is commonly referred to as the exclusion ratio.) After the taxpayer has recovered all of his basis, then 100% of the payments thereafter are subject to ordinary income tax.
Since the Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2003, the use of variable annuities as a tax shelter has greatly diminished, because the growth of mutual funds and now most of the dividends of the fund are taxed at long term capital gains rates. This taxation, contrasted with the taxation of all the growth of variable annuities at income rates, means that in most cases, variable annuities shouldn't be used for tax shelters unless very long holding periods apply (for example, more than 20 years).
Insurance company default risk and state guaranty associations[edit]
Main article: Guaranty association
An investor should consider the financial strength of the insurance company that writes annuity contracts. Major insolvencies have occurred at least 62 times since the conspicuous collapse of the Executive Life Insurance Company in 1991.[1]
Insurance company defaults are governed by state law. The laws are, however, broadly similar in most states. Annuity contracts are protected against insurance company insolvency up to a specific dollar limit, often $100,000, but as high as $500,000 in New York [2], New Jersey [3], and the state of Washington [4]. California is the only state that has a limit less than 100%; the limit is 80% up to $300,000.[7] This protection is not insurance and is not provided by a government agency. It is provided by an entity called the state guaranty association. When an insolvency occurs, the guaranty association steps in to protect annuity holders, and decides what to do on a case-by-case basis. Sometimes the contracts will be taken over and fulfilled by a solvent insurance company.
The state guaranty association is not a government agency, but states usually require insurance companies to belong to it as a condition of being licensed to do business. The guaranty associations of the fifty states are members of a national umbrella association, the National Organization of Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Associations (NOLHGA). The NOLHGA website provides a description of the organization, links to websites for the individual state organizations, and links to the actual text of the governing state laws.
A difference between guaranty association protection and the protection of bank accounts by the FDIC, credit union accounts by the NCUA, and brokerage accounts by the SIPC, is that it is difficult for consumers to learn about this protection. Usually, state law prohibits insurance agents and companies from using the guaranty association in any advertising and agents are prohibited by statute from using this Web site or the existence of the guaranty association as an inducement to purchase insurance(e.g., [5]). Presumably, this is a response to concerns by stronger insurance companies about moral hazard.
Compensation for advisors or salespeople[edit]
Deferred annuities, including fixed, fixed indexed and variable, typically pay the advisor or salesperson 1 percent to 10 percent of the amount invested as a commission, with possible trail options of 25 basis points to 1 percent. Sometimes the advisor can select his payout option, which might be either 7 or 10 percent up front, or 5 percent up front with a 25 basis point trail, or 1 percent to 3 percent up front with a 1 percent trail. Trail commissions are most common in variable annuities while fixed annuities and fixed indexed annuities typically pay an up front commission.
Some firms allow an investor to pick an annuity share class, which determines the salesperson's commission schedule. The main variables are the up-front commission and the trail commission.
Fixed and Indexed Annuity commissions are paid to the agent by the insurance companies the agent represents. Commissions are not paid by the client (annuitant).
"No-load" variable annuities are available on a direct-to-consumer basis from several no-load mutual fund companies. "No-load" means the products have no sales commissions or surrender charges.
References[edit]

^ "Annuity Definition". Annuity.com. Retrieved 2012-11-14. .
^ Mark P. Cussen, CFP®, CMFC, AFC. "Introduction To Annuities: The History Of Annuities". Investopedia. Retrieved February 28, 2015. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ "The History of Annuities". Annuity Guys®. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ "SEC.gov - Annuities". sec.gov. April 6, 2011. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ US SEC Answers on Equity-Indexed Annuities Archived February 9, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "SEC.gov - Variable Annuities: What You Should Know". sec.gov. April 18, 2011. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ "State Guarantee Funds". annuityadvantage.com. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 


External links[edit]

National Association of Insurance Commissioners
The National Association for Fixed Annuities





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Annuity_(American)&oldid=770918367"					
Categories: Insurance in the United StatesUnited States contract lawAnnuitiesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Uses authors parameterWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from February 2015Articles needing additional references from March 2012All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2012 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Español 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 March 2017, at 12:11.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











SEC Info - SBL Variable Annuity Account XIV, et al. - ‘485APOS’ on 3/1/02 - EX-99.3D










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




SBL Variable Annuity Account XIV, et al. – ‘485APOS’ on 3/1/02 – EX-99.3DOn:  Friday, 3/1/02   ·   Accession #:  1116625-2-9   ·   File #s:  333-52114, 811-10011
Previous ‘485APOS’:  ‘485APOS’ on 2/20/01   ·   Next:  ‘485APOS’ on 3/1/02   ·   Latest:  ‘485APOS’ on 2/21/13



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size

 3/01/02  SBL Variable Annuity Account XIV  485APOS               15:901K
          SBL Variable Annuity Account XIVF-->Post-Effective AmendmentFiling Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: 485APOS     Pea #1 & 6                                          HTML    450K 
15: EX-99.14    Powers of Attorney                                  HTML     25K 
 2: EX-99.3D    Sbl Variable Products Sales Agreement               HTML     24K 
 3: EX-99.4P    Enhanced and Guaranteed Growth Death Benefit Rider  HTML     14K 
 4: EX-99.4Q    Enhanced, Annual Stepped Up and Guaranteed Growth   HTML     15K 
                          Death Benefit Rider                                    
 5: EX-99.4R    Enhanced Death Benefit Rider                        HTML     11K 
 6: EX-99.4S    Enhanced and Annual Stepped Up Death Benefit Rider  HTML     12K 
 7: EX-99.8A    Participation Agreement - Franklin Templeton        HTML    130K 
 8: EX-99.8B    Participation Agreement - Aim                       HTML    120K 
 9: EX-99.8C    Participation Agreement - Federated                 HTML     75K 
10: EX-99.8D    Participation Agreement - Fidelity                  HTML     90K 
11: EX-99.8E    Participation Agreement - Neuberger Berman          HTML     63K 
12: EX-99.8F    Participation Agreement - Rydex                     HTML     90K 
13: EX-99.8G    Participation Agreement - Strong                    HTML     84K 
14: EX-99.9     Opinion of Counsel                                  HTML      9K 

D-->EX-99.3D   —   Sbl Variable Products Sales Agreement
H-->This exhibit is an HTML Document rendered as filed.  [ Alternative Formats ]


P-->EX-99.3D1st "Page" of 2TOC↑TopPreviousNext↓BottomJust 1st 

  Sales Agreement  


[SBL LOGO]
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
A Member of The Security                               700 SW Harrison St.
Benefit Group of Companies                             Topeka, Kansas 66636-0001
                                                       (785) 431-3000

         PRIMARY GENERAL AGENCY                            BROKER/DEALER

                      SBL VARIABLE PRODUCTS SALES AGREEMENT

Effective Date:

    1.   This Agreement is made among Security  Benefit Life Insurance  Company,
         of Topeka,  Kansas, and its affiliated company,  Security Distributors,
         Inc.,  hereinafter jointly called "SBL,"  ("Broker/Dealer") and each of
         the agencies listed on Exhibit "A", attached hereto (if any), ("General
         Agent").   SBL  hereby  authorizes   Broker/Dealer  and  those  persons
         associated  with General Agent who are  registered  representatives  of
         Broker/Dealer  and  licensed  agents of SBL to solicit  and service (1)
         variable   annuities  issued  under  Security  Benefit  Life  Insurance
         Company's  several  Variable  Annuity  Accounts and (2)  variable  life
         insurance   policies  issued  under  Security  Benefit  Life  Insurance
         Company's variable life accounts, each of which have been registered as
         securities under the Securities Act of 1933 with Security Distributors,
         Inc. (a member of the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc.)
         having been designated  Principal  Underwriter  thereof.  Said variable
         annuity contracts and variable life insurance  policies are referred to
         herein as "variable products."

    2.   General  Agent is hereby  authorized  to solicit,  and to recommend for
         appointment  subagents  (referred to herein as Agents) to solicit sales
         of SBL variable products, to deliver the contracts,  and to service the
         business.  General  Agent may organize,  train,  and maintain an agency
         force;  however,  SBL may at its option,  refuse to  contract  with any
         proposed  Agent and may at any time  terminate any  Agreement  with any
         Agent.

         General  Agent  agrees  to abide by the terms  and  conditions  of this
         Agreement and any sales  manuals  and/or rules and practices of SBL and
         agrees  that its Agents  will not (i)  solicit or submit  applications,
         (ii) receive any  compensation  based on  transactions in securities or
         the  provision  of  securities  advice,  or (iii)  engage  in any other
         securities  activities,  unless such Agents are properly licensed under
         applicable   insurance  laws  and  are  "associated   persons"  of  the
         Broker/Dealer  within the meaning of "associated  person of a broker or
         dealer,"  as that term is used in Section  3(a)(18)  of the  Securities
         Exchange Act of 1934.  General Agent agrees to abide by all  applicable
         local,  state and federal laws and  regulations in conducting  business
         under this Agreement.  General Agent  undertakes and agrees to hold SBL
         harmless against any loss of whatever kind or nature arising out of any
         claim made by any of said agents for compensation.

         General  Agent shall  endeavor  to promote  SBL's  interests  and those
         mutual  interests  of  General  Agent and SBL as  contemplated  by this
         Agreement  and shall at all times  conduct  itself,  and see that those
         Agents  assigned  to or  appointed  by General  Agent or its  employees
         conduct  themselves,  so  as  not  to  adversely  affect  the  business
         reputation or good standing of either General Agent or SBL. The primary
         General Agent agrees to provide the affiliated General Agents listed on
         Exhibit "A" attached hereto (if any), with a copy of this agreement and
         insure compliance with its terms by each General Agents.

         General  Agent shall be  responsible  to SBL for the acts of the Agents
         assigned to or appointed by General  Agent or its  employees  and shall
         indemnify and hold harmless from any and all expenses, costs, causes of
         actions,   and/or  damages   resulting  from  or  growing  out  of  any
         unauthorized act by General Agent or any of its Agents or employees. In
         addition, the primary General Agent shall be responsible to SBL for the
         acts of each of the  affiliated  General  Agents  (if  any)  listed  on
         Exhibit "A",  attached  hereto,  and shall  indemnify and hold harmless
         from any and all expenses,  costs,  causes of actions,  and/or  damages
         resulting from or growing out of any  unauthorized act by General Agent
         or any of its Agents or employees.

    3.   Broker/Dealer  hereby accepts  authorization to solicit and service SBL
         variable products and confirms that  Broker/Dealer is properly licensed
         to solicit and service such  variable  products for SBL and is a member
         in good standing of the National  Association  of  Securities  Dealers,
         Inc., hereinafter called "NASD," and further agrees to notify SBL if it
         ceases to be a member of NASD.

    4.   Broker/Dealer shall have the authority to recruit,  train and supervise
         registered  representatives  for the sale of variable  products of SBL.
         Such training and supervision  shall be conducted by the  Broker/Dealer
         in  accordance  with the  Securities  Exchange Act of 1934,  the NASD's
         Rules of Fair Practice and other applicable law. SBL reserves the right
         to require termination of any registered representative's right to sell
         SBL  variable  products.  Broker/Dealer  shall be  responsible  for any
         registered representative appointed hereunder complying with the terms,
         conditions and limitations as set forth in this Agreement.

    5.   Commissions  on  stipulated  payments  or  premiums  accepted by SBL on
         behalf of an  annuitant,  participant,  or  policyholder  of a variable
         product  covered  by this  Agreement  will be in  accordance  with  the
         Schedule of Commissions  made part of this  Agreement,  and are in full
         consideration of all services rendered and expenses incurred  hereunder
         by the General Agent and Broker/Dealer or their representatives.  First
         year  commissions  are  payable  when an  individual  variable  annuity
         contract, group variable annuity certificate or variable life insurance
         policy is issued  and paid for upon an  application  submitted  through
         Broker/Dealer and accepted by the applicant thereof.  General Agent and
         Broker/Dealer  are  not  authorized  to  deduct  commissions  prior  to
         forwarding  any  remittance  received  to SBL.  All  checks  or  drafts
         received  by the  General  Agent or  Broker/Dealer  in  regards  to any
         variable  product  shall  be made  payable  to  Security  Benefit  Life
         Insurance Company.  All compensation payable hereunder shall be subject
         to a first lien and may be  reduced  or set off as to any  indebtedness
         owed by the General Agent or Broker/Dealer to SBL. Any commissions paid
         to a third party at the request of the General  Agent or  Broker/Dealer
         shall be deducted from the commissions payable hereunder.  In the event
         this agreement is executed by one or more affiliated insurance agencies
         listed on Exhibit  "A",  it is  understood  and agreed that the primary
         agency will collect and disburse  said  commissions  to the  soliciting
         General Agency.

    6.   General  Agent  and  Broker/Dealer  agree  to be  bound  by the  terms,
         conditions  and  limitations  set forth in this Agreement and the rules
         and practices of SBL that are now and hereafter in force. Broker/Dealer
         agrees not to solicit or submit  applications for variable  products to
         SBL  unless  they and their  registered  representatives  are  properly
         licensed,  and further  agrees that it will  conform to all  applicable
         state,  federal and local laws and  regulations in conducting  business
         under this Agreement.  Both SBL and Broker/Dealer hereby agree to abide
         by the  applicable  Rules of Fair  Practice of the NASD which Rules are
         incorporated  herein  as if set  forth in  full.  The  signing  of this
         Agreement and the purchase of variable  products  pursuant thereto is a
         representation  to SBL  that  Broker/Dealer  is a  properly  registered
         Broker/Dealer under the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934.

    7.   Neither the General Agent,  Broker/Dealer nor their representatives are
         authorized  to  make  any   representations   concerning  the  variable
         products,  their sponsor  (SBL),  the principal  underwriter  (Security
         Distributors,  Inc.)  or  the  underlying  mutual  funds  except  those
         contained in the  applicable  current  prospectuses  and in the printed
         information furnished by SBL. General Agent and Broker/Dealer agree not
         to use any other advertising or sales material relating to the variable
         products unless specifically approved in writing by SBL.

    8.   General  Agent  and  Broker/Dealer  are  not  authorized  and  have  no
         authority (a) to make, alter or discharge any contract for or on behalf
         of SBL,  (b) endorse any check or draft  payable to SBL,  (c) to accept
         any variable product consideration after the initial remittance, (d) to
         waive  or  modify  any  prospectus,  contract,  policy  or  application
         provision,  condition or obligation, (e) to extend the time for payment
         of any variable product consideration or accept payment of any past due
         variable product consideration.

    9.   This  Agreement  shall  not  create  or be  construed  as  creating  an
         Employer-Employee or Master-Servant  relationship between General Agent
         and SBL or Broker/Dealer and SBL.

   10.   General Agent agrees to keep accurate  records on all business  written
         and moneys received under this Agreement.  Such records may be examined
         by SBL or its representatives at any reasonable time.

   11.   General Agent and Broker/Dealer  agree to be responsible for any county
         or municipal occupational or privilege fee, tax or license which may be
         required of General Agent,  Broker/Dealer or its  representatives  as a
         result of business submitted under this Agreement.

   12.   Broker/Dealer  will maintain books and records  relating to the sale of
         the  variable  products and the receipt and  disbursement  of insurance
         commissions and fees thereon. Such books and records will be maintained
         and preserved in conformity  with the  requirements of Section 17(a) of
         the Securities  Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules  thereunder,  to the
         extent applicable,  and will at all times be compiled and maintained in
         a manner  that  permits  inspection  by the  supervisory  personnel  of
         Broker/Dealer,  the Securities and Exchange  Commission,  the NASD, and
         other appropriate regulatory authorities.

   13.   The receipt of commissions  and fees relating to the variable  products
         will  be  reflected  in  the  quarterly  FOCUS  reports  filed  by  the
         Broker/Dealer and in its fee assessment reports filed with the NASD.

   14.   A   designated    principal   of   Broker/Dealer   will   approve   all
         advertisements.

   15.   All premiums  derived from the sale of the  variable  products  will be
         sent directly to SBL, or will be sent by customers to the Broker/Dealer
         for  forwarding to SBL. The General Agent will not receive,  accumulate
         or maintain custody of customer funds.

   16.   Neither this Agreement nor the compensation  payable hereunder shall be
         assigned or pledged  without the written  consent of SBL.  SBL reserves
         the right to reject any assignment or pledge.

   17.   No consent or change in this Agreement shall be binding upon SBL unless
         in writing and signed by the president, a vice president,  secretary or
         an assistant secretary of SBL. Any failure of SBL to insist upon strict
         compliance  with the provisions of this Agreement  shall not constitute
         or be construed as a waiver thereof.

   18.   SBL shall have the right to decline  or modify  any  application  or to
         refund any variable product  consideration or any portion thereof,  and
         General  Agent shall refund  immediately  upon request any  commissions
         received  in  connection  therewith.   All  applications  for  variable
         products are subject to  acceptance  by SBL and become  effective  only
         upon confirmation by SBL. General Agent agrees to return to SBL without
         delay any  commissions  received  on a variable  product,  contract  or
         policy if such  contract or policy is tendered  for  redemption  within
         seven (7) business days after acceptance of the application by SBL.

   19.   Variable products, contracts and policies will be offered to the public
         at the price as outlined in the applicable  variable  product's current
         prospectus. All cash surrenders require the written request and consent
         of the contract or policyowner  and such surrenders will conform to the
         provisions set forth in the applicable contract or policy.

   20.   SBL  has  been  and is  designated  Administrative  Agent  of  Security
         Distributors,  Inc.  to perform  duties,  including  recordkeeping  and
         payment of  commissions,  necessary  under this Agreement in connection
         with  the  solicitation,   sales  and  servicing  of  variable  annuity
         contracts sold and solicited hereunder.

   21.   SBL  reserves  the right to amend or  terminate  this  agreement at any
         time.  In the  event  (i)  Broker/Dealer  ceases to be a member in good
         standing  of  the  NASD;  (ii)  General  Agent's  license  is  revoked,
         terminated  or not renewed;  or (iii)  General  Agent or  Broker/Dealer
         files or,  has filed on its  behalf a  petition  for  bankruptcy,  this
         Agreement  shall   terminate   automatically   without  notice.   After
         termination General Agent and Broker/Dealer upon request, shall without
         delay  pay in full  any  indebtedness  owed to SBL and  return  all SBL
         property  to  their  Home  Office.   In  the  event  General  Agent  or
         Broker/Dealer  are doing  business  in such manner  that  servicing  is
         impossible, SBL reserves the right to reassign the business and service
         fees to another party.  Should General Agent or  Broker/Dealer  fail to
         comply with any of the terms of this Agreement,  SBL reserves the right
         to terminate this Agreement and terminate vesting as to all commissions
         payable hereunder.

   22.   General  Agent and  Broker/Dealer  agree to hold harmless and indemnify
         SBL against any and all claims,  liabilities and expenses which SBL may
         incur from  liabilities  arising  out of or based  upon any  alleged or
         untrue  statement other than statements  contained in the  registration
         statement, prospectus or approved sales materials of any contract.

   23.   If it should  appear that any term of this contract is in conflict with
         any applicable rule of law, statute, or regulation,  then any such term
         shall be deemed  inoperative  and null and void insofar as it may be in
         conflict therewith and shall be deemed modified to conform to such rule
         of law,  statute,  or  regulation.  The  existence of any such apparent
         conflict  shall  not  invalidate  the  remaining   provisions  of  this
         contract.

    24.  This  agreement may be executed in one or more  counterparts,  together
         which shall be deemed a complete original.

   25.   This  Agreement is effective as of the  Effective  Date set forth above
         and  replaces any previous  Agreement  between the parties  relating to
         variable  products  of  SBL  except  as  to  any  commissions   payable
         thereunder.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed
as of the Effective Date set forth above.

SECURITY DISTRIBUTORS, INC.             BROKER/DEALER:

By :       GREGORY J. GARVIN           By:  ___________________________________
       ---------------------------                (Signature of Principal)
Name:      Gregory J. Garvin
Title:     President

                                        _______________________________________
                                                 (Name and Title of Principal)

SECURITY BENEFIT LIFE INSURANCE         PRIMARY GENERAL AGENT:

By:        GREGORY J. GARVIN           By:  ___________________________________
       ---------------------------                (Signature)
Name:      Gregory J. Garvin
Title:     Senior Vice President

                                        ________________________________________
                                                     (Name and Title)

P-->EX-99.3DLast "Page" of 2TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 2nd
                                  EXHIBIT "A"

AFFILIATED GENERAL AGENTS

NAME                                                 TAX I.D. #

3-WAY  9482C (R7-00)






↑TopFiling Submission 0001116625-02-000009   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Fri, 28 Jul 15:17:31.0 GMT 



Annuity (American) - Wikipedia





















 






Annuity (American)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For other uses, see Annuity (disambiguation).





This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In the United States, an annuity is a contractually executed, relatively low-risk investment product, where the insured (usually, an individual) pays a life insurance company a lump-sum premium at the start of the contract. That money is to be paid back to the insured in fixed, incremental amounts, over some future period (predetermined by the insured). The insurer invests the premium; the resulting profit/return on investment funds the payments received by the insured and compensate the insurer. Conventional annuity contracts provide a predictable, guaranteed stream of future income (e.g., for retirement) until the death(s) of the beneficiaries(s) named in the contract, or, until a future termination date — whichever occurs first.[1]



Contents


1 History
2 General
3 Immediate annuity

3.1 Annuity with period certain
3.2 Life annuity

3.2.1 Life annuity variants




4 Deferred annuity

4.1 Features
4.2 Criticisms of deferred annuities


5 Taxation
6 Insurance company default risk and state guaranty associations
7 Compensation for advisors or salespeople
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
Although annuities have existed in their present form only for a few decades, the idea of paying out a stream of income to an individual or family dates back to the Roman Empire. The Latin word annua meant annual stipends, and during the reign of the emperors, the word signified a contract that made annual payments. Individuals would make a single large payment into the annua and then receive an annual payment each year until death, or for a specified period of time. The Roman speculator and jurist Gnaeus Domitius Annius Ulpianus is cited as one of the earliest dealers of these annuities, and he is also credited with creating the first actuarial life table. Roman soldiers were paid annuities as a form of compensation for military service. During the Middle Ages, annuities were used by feudal lords and kings to help cover the heavy costs of their constant wars and conflicts with each other. At this time, annuities were offered in the form of a tontine, or a large pool of cash from which payments were made to investors.[2]
One of the early recorded uses of annuities in the United States was by the Presbyterian Church in 1720. The purpose was to provide a secure retirement to aging ministers and their families, and was later expanded to assist widows and orphans. In 1912, Pennsylvania Company Insurance was among the first to begin offering annuities to the general public in the United States. Some prominent figures who are noted for their use of annuities include: Benjamin Franklin assisting the cities of Boston and Philadelphia; Babe Ruth avoiding losses during the great depression, O. J. Simpson protecting his income from lawsuits and creditors. Ben Bernanke in 2006 disclosed that his major financial assets are two annuities.[3]
General[edit]
Annuity contracts in the United States are defined by the Internal Revenue Code and regulated by the individual states. Variable annuities have features of both life insurance and investment products.[4] In the U.S., annuity insurance may be issued only by life insurance companies, although private annuity contracts may be arranged between donors to non-profits to reduce taxes. Insurance companies are regulated by the states, so contracts or options that may be available in some states may not be available in others. Their federal tax treatment, however, is governed by the Internal Revenue Code. Variable annuities are regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission and the sale of variable annuities is overseen by the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) (the largest non-governmental regulator for all securities firms doing business in the United States).
There are two possible phases for an annuity, one phase in which the customer deposits and accumulates money into an account (the deferral phase), and another phase in which customers receive payments for some period of time (the annuity or income phase). During this latter phase, the insurance company makes income payments that may be set for a stated period of time, such as five years, or continue until the death of the customer(s) (the "annuitant(s)") named in the contract. Annuitization over a lifetime can have a death benefit guarantee over a certain period of time, such as ten years. Annuity contracts with a deferral phase always have an annuity phase and are called deferred annuities. An annuity contract may also be structured so that it has only the annuity phase; such a contract is called an immediate annuity. Note this is not always the case.
Immediate annuity[edit]
The term "annuity," as used in financial theory, is most closely related to what is today called an immediate annuity. This is an insurance policy which, in exchange for a sum of money, guarantees that the issuer will make a series of payments. These payments may be either level or increasing periodic payments for a fixed term of years or until the ending of a life or two lives, or even whichever is longer. It is also possible to structure the payments under an immediate annuity so that they vary with the performance of a specified set of investments, usually bond and equity mutual funds. Such a contract is called a variable immediate annuity. See also life annuity, below.
The overarching characteristic of the immediate annuity is that it is a vehicle for distributing savings with a tax-deferred growth factor. A common use for an immediate annuity might be to provide a pension income. In the U.S., the tax treatment of a non-qualified immediate annuity is that every payment is a combination of a return of principal (which part is not taxed) and income (which is taxed at ordinary income rates, not capital gain rates). Immediate annuities funded as an IRA do not have any tax advantages, but typically the distribution satisfies the IRS RMD requirement and may satisfy the RMD requirement for other IRA accounts of the owner (see IRS Sec 1.401(a)(9)-6.)
When a deferred annuity is annuitized, it works like an immediate annuity from that point on, but with a lower cost basis and thus more of the payment is taxed.
Annuity with period certain[edit]
This type of immediate annuity pays the annuitant for a designated number of years (i.e., a period certain) and is used to fund a need that will end when the period is up (for example, it might be used to fund the premiums for a term life insurance policy). Thus the person may outlive the number of years the annuity will pay.
Life annuity[edit]
Main article: Life annuity
A life or lifetime immediate annuity is used to provide an income for the life of the annuitant similar to a defined benefit or pension plan.
A life annuity works somewhat like a loan that is made by the purchaser (contract owner) to the issuing (insurance) company, which pays back the original capital or principal (which isn't taxed) with interest and/or gains (which is taxed as ordinary income) to the annuitant on whose life the annuity is based. The assumed period of the loan is based on the life expectancy of the annuitant. In order to guarantee that the income continues for life, the insurance company relies on a concept called cross-subsidy or the "law of large numbers". Because an annuity population can be expected to have a distribution of lifespans around the population's mean (average) age, those dying earlier will give up income to support those living longer whose money would otherwise run out. Thus it is a form of longevity insurance (see also below).
A life annuity, ideally, can reduce the "problem" faced by a person when they don't know how long they will live, and so they don't know the optimal speed at which to spend their savings. Life annuities with payments indexed to the Consumer Price Index might be an acceptable solution to this problem, but there is only a thin market for them in North America.
Life annuity variants[edit]
For an additional expense (either by way of an increase in payments (premium) or a decrease in benefits), an annuity or benefit rider can be purchased on another life such as a spouse, family member or friend for the duration of whose life the annuity is wholly or partly guaranteed. For example, it is common to buy an annuity which will continue to pay out to the spouse of the annuitant after death, for so long as the spouse survives. The annuity paid to the spouse is called a reversionary annuity or survivorship annuity. However, if the annuitant is in good health, it may be more advantageous to select the higher payout option on his or her life only and purchase a life insurance policy that would pay income to the survivor.
The pure life annuity can have harsh consequences for the annuitant who dies before recovering his or her investment in the contract. Such a situation, called a forfeiture, can be mitigated by the addition of a period-certain feature under which the annuity issuer is required to make annuity payments for at least a certain number of years; if the annuitant outlives the specified period certain, annuity payments continue until the annuitant's death, and if the annuitant dies before the expiration of the period certain, the annuitant's estate or beneficiary is entitled to the remaining payments certain. The tradeoff between the pure life annuity and the life-with-period-certain annuity is that the annuity payment for the latter is smaller. A viable alternative to the life-with-period-certain annuity is to purchase a single-premium life policy that would cover the lost premium in the annuity.
Impaired-life annuities for smokers or those with a particular illness are also available from some insurance companies. Since the life expectancy is reduced, the annual payment to the purchaser is raised.
Life annuities are priced based on the probability of the annuitant surviving to receive the payments. Longevity insurance is a form of annuity that defers commencement of the payments until very late in life. A common longevity contract would be purchased at or before retirement but would not commence payments until 20 years after retirement. If the nominee dies before payments commence there is no payable benefit. This drastically reduces the cost of the annuity while still providing protection against outliving one's resources.
Deferred annuity[edit]
The second usage for the term annuity came into being during the 1970s. Such a contract is more properly referred to as a deferred annuity and is chiefly a vehicle for accumulating savings with a view to eventually distributing them either in the manner of an immediate annuity or as a lump-sum payment.
All varieties of deferred annuities owned by individuals have one thing in common: any increase in account values is not taxed until those gains are withdrawn. This is also known as tax-deferred growth.
A deferred annuity which grows by interest rate earnings alone is called a fixed deferred annuity (FA). A deferred annuity that permits allocations to stock or bond funds and for which the account value is not guaranteed to stay above the initial amount invested is called a variable annuity (VA).
A new category of deferred annuity, called the fixed indexed annuity (FIA) emerged in 1995 (originally called an Equity-Indexed Annuity).[5] Fixed indexed annuities may have features of both fixed and variable deferred annuities. The insurance company typically guarantees a minimum return for EIA. An investor can still lose money if he or she cancels (or surrenders) the policy early, before a "break even" period. An oversimplified expression of a typical EIA's rate of return might be that it is equal to a stated "participation rate" multiplied by a target stock market index's performance excluding dividends. Interest rate caps or an administrative fee may be applicable.
Deferred annuities in the United States have the advantage that taxation of all capital gains and ordinary income is deferred until withdrawn. In theory, such tax-deferred compounding allows more money to be put to work while the savings are accumulating, leading to higher returns. A disadvantage, however, is that when amounts held under a deferred annuity are withdrawn or inherited, the interest/gains are immediately taxed as ordinary income.
Features[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


A variety of features and guarantees have been developed by insurance companies in order to make annuity products more attractive. These include death and living benefit options, extra credit options, account guarantees, spousal continuation benefits, reduced contingent deferred sales charges (or surrender charges), and various combinations thereof. Each feature or benefit added to a contract will typically be accompanied by an additional expense either directly (billed to client) or indirectly (inside product).
Deferred annuities are usually divided into two different kinds:

Fixed annuities offer some sort of guaranteed rate of return over the life of the contract. In general such contracts are often positioned to be somewhat like bank CDs and offer a rate of return competitive with those of CDs of similar time frames. Many fixed annuities, however, do not have a fixed rate of return over the life of the contract, offering instead a guaranteed minimum rate and a first year introductory rate. The rate after the first year is often an amount that may be set at the insurance company's discretion subject, however, to the minimum amount (typically 3%). There are usually some provisions in the contract to allow a percentage of the interest and/or principal to be withdrawn early and without penalty (usually the interest earned in a 12-month period or 10%), unlike most CDs. Fixed annuities normally become fully liquid depending on the surrender schedule or upon the owner's death. Most equity index annuities are properly categorized as fixed annuities and their performance is typically tied to a stock market index (usually the S&P 500 or the Dow Jones Industrial Average). These products are guaranteed but are not as easy to understand as standard fixed annuities as there are usually caps, spreads, margins, and crediting methods that can reduce returns. These products also don't pay any of the participating market indices' dividends; the trade-off is that contract holder can never earn less than 0% in a negative year.
Variable annuities allow money to be invested in insurance company "separate accounts" (which are sometimes referred to as "subaccounts" and in any case are functionally similar to mutual funds) in a tax-deferred manner.[6] Their primary use is to allow an investor to engage in tax-deferred investing for retirement in amounts greater than permitted by individual retirement or 401(k) plans. In addition, many variable annuity contracts offer a guaranteed minimum rate of return (either for a future withdrawal and/or in the case of the owner's death), even if the underlying separate account investments perform poorly. This can be attractive to people uncomfortable investing in the equity markets without the guarantees. Of course, an investor will pay for each benefit provided by a variable annuity, since insurance companies must charge a premium to cover the insurance guarantees of such benefits. Variable annuities are regulated both by the individual states (as insurance products) and by the Securities and Exchange Commission (as securities under the federal securities laws). The SEC requires that all of the charges under variable annuities be described in great detail in the prospectus that is offered to each variable annuity customer. Of course, potential customers should review these charges carefully, just as one would in purchasing mutual fund shares. People who sell variable annuities are usually regulated by FINRA, whose rules of conduct require a careful analysis of the suitability of variable annuities (and other securities products) to those to whom they recommend such products. These products are often criticized as being sold to the wrong persons, who could have done better investing in a more suitable alternative, since the commissions paid under this product are often high relative to other investment products.

There are several types of performance guarantees, and one may often choose them à la carte, with higher risk charges for guarantees that are riskier for the insurance companies. The first type is a guaranteed minimum death benefit (GMDB), which can be received only if the owner of the annuity contract, or the covered annuitant, dies.
GMDBs come in various flavors, in order of increasing risk to the insurance company:

Return of premium (a guarantee that you will not have a negative return)
Roll-up of premium at a particular rate (a guarantee that you will achieve a minimum rate of return, greater than 0)
Maximum anniversary value (looks back at account value on the anniversaries, and guarantees you will get at least as much as the highest values upon death)
Greater of maximum anniversary value or particular roll-up

Insurance companies provide even greater insurance coverage on guaranteed living benefits, which tend to be elective. Unlike death benefits, which the contractholder generally cannot time, living benefits pose significant risk for insurance companies as contractholders will likely exercise these benefits when they are worth the most. Annuities with guaranteed living benefits (GLBs) tend to have high fees commensurate with the additional risks underwritten by the issuing insurer.
Some GLB examples, in no particular order:

Guaranteed minimum income benefit (GMIB, a guarantee that one will get a minimum income stream upon annuitization at a particular point in the future)
Guaranteed minimum accumulation lbenefit (GMAB, a guarantee that the account value will be at a certain amount at a certain point in the future)
Guaranteed minimum withdrawal benefit (GMWB, a guarantee similar to the income benefit, but one that doesn't require annuitizing)
Guaranteed-for-life income benefit (a guarantee similar to a withdrawal benefit, where withdrawals begin and continue until cash value becomes zero, withdrawals stop when cash value is zero and then annuitization occurs on the guaranteed benefit amount for a payment amount that is not determined until annuitization date.)

Recently, insurance companies developed asset-transfer programs that operate at the contract level or the fund level. In the former, a percentage of client's account value will be transferred to a designated low-risk fund when the contract has poor investment performance. On the fund level, certain investment options have a target volatility built within the fund (usually about 10%) and will re-balance to maintain that target. In both cases, they are stated to help buffer poor investment performance until markets perform better (where they will transition back to normal allocations to catch an upswing). However, there are criticisms of these programs including, but not limited to, often mandating these programs on clients, restricting flexibility of investing, and not catching the upswing of markets fast enough due to the underlying design of such programs.
Be careful in regard to using GLB riders in non-qualified contracts as most of the products in the annuity marketplace today create a 100% taxable income benefit whereas income generated from an immediate annuity in a non-qualified contract would partially be a return of principal and therefore non-taxable.
Criticisms of deferred annuities[edit]





This section does not cite any sources. Please help improve this section by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Some annuities do not have any deferred surrender charges and do not pay the financial professional a commission, although the financial professional may charge a fee for his or her advice. These contracts are called "no-load" variable annuity products and are usually available from a fee-based financial planner or directly from a no-load mutual fund company. Of course various charges are still imposed on these contracts, but they are less than those sold by commissioned brokers. It is important that potential purchasers of annuities, mutual funds, tax-exempt municipal bonds, commodities futures, interest rate swaps, in short, any financial instrument understand the fees on the product and the fees a financial planner may charge.
Variable annuities are controversial because many believe the extra fees (i.e., the fees above and beyond those charged for similar retail mutual funds that offer no principal protection or guarantees of any kind) may reduce the rate of return compared to what the investor could make by investing directly in similar investments outside of the variable annuity. A big selling point for variable annuities is the guarantees many have, such as the guarantee that the customer will not lose his or her principal. Critics say that these guarantees are not necessary because over the long term the market has always been positive, while others say that with the uncertainty of the financial markets many investors simply will not invest without guarantees.[who?] Past returns are no guarantee of future performance, of course, and different investors have different risk tolerances, different investment horizons, different family situations, and so on. The sale of any security product should involve a careful analysis of the suitability of the product for a given individual.
Taxation[edit]
In the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, the growth of the annuity value during the accumulation phase is tax-deferred, that is, not subject to current income tax, for annuities owned by individuals. The tax deferred status of deferred annuities has led to their common usage in the United States. Under the U.S. tax code, the benefits from annuity contracts do not always have to be taken in the form of a fixed stream of payments (annuitization), and many annuity contracts are bought primarily for the tax benefits rather than to receive a fixed stream of income. If an annuity is used in a qualified pension plan or an IRA funding vehicle, then 100% of the annuity payment is taxable as current income upon distribution (because the taxpayer has no tax basis in any of the money in the annuity). It should be noted this is the same tax treatment of direct participation in a qualified pension plan (such as a 401K), again, due to the fact the taxpayer has no tax basis in any of the money in the plan. If the annuity contract is purchased with after-tax dollars, then the contract holder upon annuitization recovers his basis pro-rata in the ratio of basis divided by the expected value, according to the tax regulation Section 1.72-5. (This is commonly referred to as the exclusion ratio.) After the taxpayer has recovered all of his basis, then 100% of the payments thereafter are subject to ordinary income tax.
Since the Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2003, the use of variable annuities as a tax shelter has greatly diminished, because the growth of mutual funds and now most of the dividends of the fund are taxed at long term capital gains rates. This taxation, contrasted with the taxation of all the growth of variable annuities at income rates, means that in most cases, variable annuities shouldn't be used for tax shelters unless very long holding periods apply (for example, more than 20 years).
Insurance company default risk and state guaranty associations[edit]
Main article: Guaranty association
An investor should consider the financial strength of the insurance company that writes annuity contracts. Major insolvencies have occurred at least 62 times since the conspicuous collapse of the Executive Life Insurance Company in 1991.[1]
Insurance company defaults are governed by state law. The laws are, however, broadly similar in most states. Annuity contracts are protected against insurance company insolvency up to a specific dollar limit, often $100,000, but as high as $500,000 in New York [2], New Jersey [3], and the state of Washington [4]. California is the only state that has a limit less than 100%; the limit is 80% up to $300,000.[7] This protection is not insurance and is not provided by a government agency. It is provided by an entity called the state guaranty association. When an insolvency occurs, the guaranty association steps in to protect annuity holders, and decides what to do on a case-by-case basis. Sometimes the contracts will be taken over and fulfilled by a solvent insurance company.
The state guaranty association is not a government agency, but states usually require insurance companies to belong to it as a condition of being licensed to do business. The guaranty associations of the fifty states are members of a national umbrella association, the National Organization of Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Associations (NOLHGA). The NOLHGA website provides a description of the organization, links to websites for the individual state organizations, and links to the actual text of the governing state laws.
A difference between guaranty association protection and the protection of bank accounts by the FDIC, credit union accounts by the NCUA, and brokerage accounts by the SIPC, is that it is difficult for consumers to learn about this protection. Usually, state law prohibits insurance agents and companies from using the guaranty association in any advertising and agents are prohibited by statute from using this Web site or the existence of the guaranty association as an inducement to purchase insurance(e.g., [5]). Presumably, this is a response to concerns by stronger insurance companies about moral hazard.
Compensation for advisors or salespeople[edit]
Deferred annuities, including fixed, fixed indexed and variable, typically pay the advisor or salesperson 1 percent to 10 percent of the amount invested as a commission, with possible trail options of 25 basis points to 1 percent. Sometimes the advisor can select his payout option, which might be either 7 or 10 percent up front, or 5 percent up front with a 25 basis point trail, or 1 percent to 3 percent up front with a 1 percent trail. Trail commissions are most common in variable annuities while fixed annuities and fixed indexed annuities typically pay an up front commission.
Some firms allow an investor to pick an annuity share class, which determines the salesperson's commission schedule. The main variables are the up-front commission and the trail commission.
Fixed and Indexed Annuity commissions are paid to the agent by the insurance companies the agent represents. Commissions are not paid by the client (annuitant).
"No-load" variable annuities are available on a direct-to-consumer basis from several no-load mutual fund companies. "No-load" means the products have no sales commissions or surrender charges.
References[edit]

^ "Annuity Definition". Annuity.com. Retrieved 2012-11-14. .
^ Mark P. Cussen, CFP®, CMFC, AFC. "Introduction To Annuities: The History Of Annuities". Investopedia. Retrieved February 28, 2015. CS1 maint: Uses authors parameter (link)
^ "The History of Annuities". Annuity Guys®. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ "SEC.gov - Annuities". sec.gov. April 6, 2011. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ US SEC Answers on Equity-Indexed Annuities Archived February 9, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "SEC.gov - Variable Annuities: What You Should Know". sec.gov. April 18, 2011. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 
^ "State Guarantee Funds". annuityadvantage.com. Retrieved February 28, 2015. 


External links[edit]

National Association of Insurance Commissioners
The National Association for Fixed Annuities





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Annuity_(American)&oldid=770918367"					
Categories: Insurance in the United StatesUnited States contract lawAnnuitiesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Uses authors parameterWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from February 2015Articles needing additional references from March 2012All articles needing additional referencesAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2012 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Español 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 18 March 2017, at 12:11.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.


























10 Annuity Tips You Should Know









































10 Little-Known Annuity Tips You Should Know   




Tip #1: There are different types of annuities.  Some are designed for accumulation and growth; while others are designed to maximize retirement income. Fixed annuities provide a safe alternative to bank CD’s. It’s very important to select the right type of annuity for your situation. 





Get My Annuity Report


2017's Best Annuities - Find the annuities with the highest rates, lowest fees and highest guaranteed returns in our free report. 




Tip #2: If you purchase a traditional fixed annuity, find a company that has a history of providing competitive renewal rates. This is important because the interest rate you earn is only guaranteed for a portion of the term. Some companies have a history of paying better renewal rates than others. This does not apply to CD-type annuities. 







Tip #4: If you purchase an immediate annuity with a “life with cash refund or life with installment refund” the listed beneficiaries will receive 100% of the remaining dollars.







Tip #3:  Rates that look too good to be true, usually are. Make sure to check the companies rating before purchasing and look for stable, highly rated companies. There is no free lunch. 







Tip #7: Income annuities (SPIA’s) usually provide the highest contractually guaranteed payout of any type of annuity if you need “income now”. SPIA's also have no fees. 




Looking for retirement income? Our free report shops 130+ annuities and highlights the companies with the highest guaranteed returns




Compare 1400+ annuities from the two largest annuity databases. Find the highest guaranteed returns 








Tip #5: Annuities with the shortest terms usually have the lowest commissions. Insurance agents usually get paid more the longer the money is locked up. Many states have banned annuities with terms over 10 years.




Tip #6: Diversify.   You don’t want to have all of your savings with 1 insurance company.  It’s wise to diversify and the more you have to invest the more you should diversify. 







Tip #8:  Be careful of the fees on variable annuities.  Variable annuities have many different layers of fees. Make sure to get an itemized breakdown of all of the fees.  If your variable annuity earns 7-9% pre-tax and you pay 3-4% in fees, you might be better off in fixed products and avoiding market risk.




Tip #9: Shop around. Don't trust the first person you speak to. Find the very best products on the market and look for proof. 




Tip #10:  Index annuities - 1. Does it have a cap?  2. In plain english, how is the gain calculated?  If you are looking at index annuities with an income riders we can compare 140+ products and show you which products guarantee the most income in our free report. 







Bonus Tip :  Let us help you. Request our free annuity report and we will send you what we feel are the best annuities available on the market today.





Annuity Pros and Cons




Myths 




Types 



Annuity Tips




Did you know over 1 million Americans already own an annuity?











As Seen On 


Copyright 2017 Annuity Resources



Privacy Policy 



Terms & Conditions



(888)266-8190






















;








	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started



























































SEC.gov | Variable Annuities: What You Should Know


















      Skip to main content
    









 Search SEC.gov     

Company Filings | More Search Options










U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission









Show — Main navigation
Hide — Main navigation


About


What We Do


Commissioners


Securities Laws


SEC Docket


Reports and Publications


Careers


Contact




Divisions


Corporation Finance


Enforcement


Investment Management


Economic and Risk Analysis


Trading and Markets


National Exam Program


All Divisions and Offices




Enforcement


Litigation Releases


Administrative Proceedings


Opinions and Adjudicatory Orders


Accounting and Auditing


Trading Suspensions


How Investigations Work


Administrative Law Judges




Regulation


Rulemaking Index


Proposed Rules


Final Rules


Interim Final Temporary Rules


Other Orders and Notices


Self-Regulatory Organizations


Staff Interpretations




Education


Investor.gov


Check Out a Broker or Adviser


Investor Alerts and Bulletins


Fast Answers


File a Tip or Complaint


Publications




Filings


EDGAR Search Tools


Company Filing Search


How to Search EDGAR


Requesting Public Documents


Forms List


Information for Filers


About EDGAR




News


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speeches


Testimony


Spotlight Topics


What's New


Upcoming Events


Webcasts


SEC Videos


Media Gallery






















U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission


Divisions


Enforcement


Regulation


Education


Filings


Newsroom




Newsroom


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speehes


Testimony




RSS Feeds


Press Releases


Public Statements


Speeches


Testimony




Social Media


@SEC_News


SEC Channel


SEC Photostream









Search SEC.gov



 



Company Filings | More Search Options













 
            Investor Publications
                   
          










































Variable Annuities: What You Should Know

                            April 18, 2011
                       


Variable annuities have become a part of the retirement and investment plans of many Americans. Before you buy a variable annuity, you should know some of the basics – and be prepared to ask your insurance agent, broker, financial planner, or other financial professional lots of questions about whether a variable annuity is right for you.
This is a general description of variable annuities – what they are, how they work, and the charges you will pay. Before buying any variable annuity, however, you should find out about the particular annuity you are considering. Request a prospectus from the insurance company or from your financial professional, and read it carefully. The prospectus contains important information about the annuity contract, including fees and charges, investment options, death benefits, and annuity payout options. You should compare the benefits and costs of the annuity to other variable annuities and to other types of investments, such as mutual funds.
Contents




    What Is a Variable Annuity?
			    How Variable Annuities Work
			    The Death Benefit and Other Features
			    Variable Annuity Charges
			    Tax-Free "1035" Exchanges
			    Bonus Credits
			    Ask Questions Before You Invest
			    For More Information




What Is a Variable Annuity? 
A variable annuity is a contract between you and an insurance company, under which the insurer agrees to make periodic payments to you, beginning either immediately or at some future date. You purchase a variable annuity contract by making either a single purchase payment or a series of purchase payments.
A variable annuity offers a range of investment options. The value of your investment as a variable annuity owner will vary depending on the performance of the investment options you choose. The investment options for a variable annuity are typically mutual funds that invest in stocks, bonds, money market instruments, or some combination of the three.
Although variable annuities are typically invested in mutual funds, variable annuities differ from mutual funds in several important ways:
First, variable annuities let you receive periodic payments for the rest of your life (or the life of your spouse or any other person you designate). This feature offers protection against the possibility that, after you retire, you will outlive your assets.
Second, variable annuities have a death benefit. If you die before the insurer has started making payments to you, your beneficiary is guaranteed to receive a specified amount – typically at least the amount of your purchase payments. Your beneficiary will get a benefit from this feature if, at the time of your death, your account value is less than the guaranteed amount.
Third, variable annuities are tax-deferred. That means you pay no taxes on the income and investment gains from your annuity until you withdraw your money. You may also transfer your money from one investment option to another within a variable annuity without paying tax at the time of the transfer. When you take your money out of a variable annuity, however, you will be taxed on the earnings at ordinary income tax rates rather than lower capital gains rates. In general, the benefits of tax deferral will outweigh the costs of a variable annuity only if you hold it as a long-term investment to meet retirement and other long-range goals.




Caution!
Other investment vehicles, such as IRAs and employer-sponsored 401(k) plans, also may provide you with tax-deferred growth and other tax advantages. For most investors, it will be advantageous to make the maximum allowable contributions to IRAs and 401(k) plans before investing in a variable annuity.
In addition, if you are investing in a variable annuity through a tax-advantaged retirement plan (such as a 401(k) plan or IRA), you will get no additional tax advantage from the variable annuity. Under these circumstances, consider buying a variable annuity only if it makes sense because of the annuity's other features, such as lifetime income payments and death benefit protection. The tax rules that apply to variable annuities can be complicated – before investing, you may want to consult a tax adviser about the tax consequences to you of investing in a variable annuity.





Remember:  Variable annuities are designed to be long-term investments, to meet retirement and other long-range goals. Variable annuities are not suitable for meeting short-term goals because substantial taxes and insurance company charges may apply if you withdraw your money early. Variable annuities also involve investment risks, just as mutual funds do.

How Variable Annuities Work 
A variable annuity has two phases: an accumulation phase and a payout phase.
During the accumulation phase, you make purchase payments, which you can allocate to a number of investment options. For example, you could designate 40% of your purchase payments to a bond fund, 40% to a U.S. stock fund, and 20% to an international stock fund. The money you have allocated to each mutual fund investment option will increase or decrease over time, depending on the fund's performance. In addition, variable annuities often allow you to allocate part of your purchase payments to a fixed account. A fixed account, unlike a mutual fund, pays a fixed rate of interest. The insurance company may reset this interest rate periodically, but it will usually provide a guaranteed minimum (e.g., 3% per year).

Example:  You purchase a variable annuity with an initial purchase payment of $10,000. You allocate 50% of that purchase payment ($5,000) to a bond fund, and 50% ($5,000) to a stock fund. Over the following year, the stock fund has a 10% return, and the bond fund has a 5% return. At the end of the year, your account has a value of $10,750 ($5,500 in the stock fund and $5,250 in the bond fund), minus fees and charges (discussed below).

Your most important source of information about a variable annuity's investment options is the prospectus. Request the prospectuses for the mutual fund investment options. Read them carefully before you allocate your purchase payments among the investment options offered. You should consider a variety of factors with respect to each fund option, including the fund's investment objectives and policies, management fees and other expenses that the fund charges, the risks and volatility of the fund, and whether the fund contributes to the diversification of your overall investment portfolio. The SEC's online publication, Mutual Fund Investing: Look at More Than a Fund's Past Performance, provides information about these factors. Another SEC online publication, Mutual Funds and ETFs – A Guide for Investors, provides general information about the types of mutual funds and the expenses they charge.
During the accumulation phase, you can typically transfer your money from one investment option to another without paying tax on your investment income and gains, although you may be charged by the insurance company for transfers. However, if you withdraw money from your account during the early years of the accumulation phase, you may have to pay "surrender charges," which are discussed below. In addition, you may have to pay a 10% federal tax penalty if you withdraw money before the age of 59½.
At the beginning of the payout phase, you may receive your purchase payments plus investment income and gains (if any) as a lump-sum payment, or you may choose to receive them as a stream of payments at regular intervals (generally monthly).
If you choose to receive a stream of payments, you may have a number of choices of how long the payments will last. Under most annuity contracts, you can choose to have your annuity payments last for a period that you set (such as 20 years) or for an indefinite period (such as your lifetime or the lifetime of you and your spouse or other beneficiary). During the payout phase, your annuity contract may permit you to choose between receiving payments that are fixed in amount or payments that vary based on the performance of mutual fund investment options.
The amount of each periodic payment will depend, in part, on the time period that you select for receiving payments. Be aware that some annuities do not allow you to withdraw money from your account once you have started receiving regular annuity payments.
In addition, some annuity contracts are structured as immediate annuities, which means that there is no accumulation phase and you will start receiving annuity payments right after you purchase the annuity.
 
The Death Benefit and Other Features 
A common feature of variable annuities is the death benefit. If you die, a person you select as a beneficiary (such as your spouse or child) will receive the greater of: (i) all the money in your account, or (ii) some guaranteed minimum (such as all purchase payments minus prior withdrawals).

Example: You own a variable annuity that offers a death benefit equal to the greater of account value or total purchase payments minus withdrawals. You have made purchase payments totaling $50,000. In addition, you have withdrawn $5,000 from your account. Because of these withdrawals and investment losses, your account value is currently $40,000. If you die, your designated beneficiary will receive $45,000 (the $50,000 in purchase payments you put in minus $5,000 in withdrawals).

Some variable annuities allow you to choose a  "stepped-up" death benefit. Under this feature, your guaranteed minimum death benefit may be based on a greater amount than purchase payments minus withdrawals. For example, the guaranteed minimum might be your account value as of a specified date, which may be greater than purchase payments minus withdrawals if the underlying investment options have performed well. The purpose of a stepped-up death benefit is to "lock in" your investment performance and prevent a later decline in the value of your account from eroding the amount that you expect to leave to your heirs. This feature carries a charge, however, which will reduce your account value.
Variable annuities sometimes offer other optional features, which also have extra charges. One common feature, the  guaranteed minimum income benefit, guarantees a particular minimum level of annuity payments, even if you do not have enough money in your account (perhaps because of investment losses) to support that level of payments.  Other features may include long-term care insurance, which pays for home health care or nursing home care if you become seriously ill.
You may want to consider the financial strength of the insurance company that sponsors any variable annuity you are considering buying. This can affect the company's ability to pay any benefits that are greater than the value of your account in mutual fund investment options, such as a death benefit, guaranteed minimum income benefit, long-term care benefit, or amounts you have allocated to a fixed account investment option.




Caution!
You will pay for each benefit provided by your variable annuity. Be sure you understand the charges. Carefully consider whether you need the benefit. If you do, consider whether you can buy the benefit more cheaply as part of the variable annuity or separately (e.g., through a long-term care insurance policy).




Variable Annuity Charges 
You will pay several charges when you invest in a variable annuity. Be sure you understand all the charges before you invest. These charges will reduce the value of your account and the return on your investment. Often, they will include the following:


Surrender charges – If you withdraw money from a variable annuity within a certain period after a purchase payment (typically within six to eight years, but sometimes as long as ten years), the insurance company usually will assess a "surrender" charge, which is a type of sales charge. This charge is used to pay your financial professional a commission for selling the variable annuity to you. Generally, the surrender charge is a percentage of the amount withdrawn, and declines gradually over a period of several years, known as the "surrender period." For example, a 7% charge might apply in the first year after a purchase payment, 6% in the second year, 5% in the third year, and so on until the eighth year, when the surrender charge no longer applies. Often, contracts will allow you to withdraw part of your account value each year – 10% or 15% of your account value, for example – without paying a surrender charge.

Example: You purchase a variable annuity contract with a $10,000 purchase payment. The contract has a schedule of surrender charges, beginning with a 7% charge in the first year, and declining by 1% each year. In addition, you are allowed to withdraw 10% of your contract value each year free of surrender charges. In the first year, you decide to withdraw $5,000, or one-half of your contract value of $10,000 (assuming that your contract value has not increased or decreased because of investment performance). In this case, you could withdraw $1,000 (10% of contract value) free of surrender charges, but you would pay a surrender charge of 7%, or $280, on the other $4,000 withdrawn.



Mortality and expense risk charge – This charge is equal to a certain percentage of your account value, typically in the range of 1.25% per year. This charge compensates the insurance company for insurance risks it assumes under the annuity contract. Profit from the mortality and expense risk charge is sometimes used to pay the insurer's costs of selling the variable annuity, such as a commission paid to your financial professional for selling the variable annuity to you.

Example: Your variable annuity has a mortality and expense risk charge at an annual rate of 1.25% of account value. Your average account value during the year is $20,000, so you will pay $250 in mortality and expense risk charges that year.



Administrative fees – The insurer may deduct charges to cover record-keeping and other administrative expenses. This may be charged as a flat account maintenance fee (perhaps $25 or $30 per year) or as a percentage of your account value (typically in the range of 0.15% per year).

Example: Your variable annuity charges administrative fees at an annual rate of 0.15% of account value. Your average account value during the year is $50,000. You will pay $75 in administrative fees.



Underlying Fund Expenses – You will also indirectly pay the fees and expenses imposed by the mutual funds that are the underlying investment options for your variable annuity.


Fees and Charges for Other Features – Special features offered by some variable annuities, such as a stepped-up death benefit, a guaranteed minimum income benefit, or long-term care insurance, often carry additional fees and charges.


Other charges, such as initial sales loads, or fees for transferring part of your account from one investment option to another, may also apply. You should ask your financial professional to explain to you all charges that may apply. You can also find a description of the charges in the prospectus for any variable annuity that you are considering.
Tax-Free “1035” Exchanges 
Section 1035 of the U.S. tax code allows you to exchange an existing variable annuity contract for a new annuity contract without paying any tax on the income and investment gains in your current variable annuity account. These tax-free exchanges, known as 1035 exchanges, can be useful if another annuity has features that you prefer, such as a larger death benefit, different annuity payout options, or a wider selection of investment choices.
You may, however, be required to pay surrender charges on the old annuity if you are still in the surrender charge period. In addition, a new surrender charge period generally begins when you exchange into the new annuity. This means that, for a significant number of years (as many as 10 years), you typically will have to pay a surrender charge (which can be as high as 9% of your purchase payments) if you withdraw funds from the new annuity. Further, the new annuity may have higher annual fees and charges than the old annuity, which will reduce your returns.




Caution!
If you are thinking about a 1035 exchange, you should compare both annuities carefully. Unless you plan to hold the new annuity for a significant amount of time, you may be better off keeping the old annuity because the new annuity typically will impose a new surrender charge period. Also, if you decide to do a 1035 exchange, you should talk to your financial professional or tax adviser to make sure the exchange will be tax-free. If you surrender the old annuity for cash and then buy a new annuity, you will have to pay tax on the surrender.




Bonus Credits 
Some insurance companies are now offering variable annuity contracts with "bonus credit" features. These contracts promise to add a bonus to your contract value based on a specified percentage (typically ranging from 1% to 5%) of purchase payments.

Example:  You purchase a variable annuity contract that offers a bonus credit of 3% on each purchase payment. You make a purchase payment of $20,000. The insurance company issuing the contract adds a bonus of $600 to your account.





Caution!
Variable annuities with bonus credits may carry a downside, however – higher expenses that can outweigh the benefit of the bonus credit offered.




Frequently, insurers will charge you for bonus credits in one or more of the following ways:


Higher surrender charges  – Surrender charges may be higher for a variable annuity that pays you a bonus credit than for a similar contract with no bonus credit.


Longer surrender periods – Your purchase payments may be subject to surrender charges for a longer period than they would be under a similar contract with no bonus credit.


Higher mortality and expense risk charges and other charges – Higher annual mortality and expense risk charges may be deducted for a variable annuity that pays you a bonus credit. Although the difference may seem small, over time it can add up. In addition, some contracts may impose a separate fee specifically to pay for the bonus credit.


Before purchasing a variable annuity with a bonus credit, ask yourself – and the financial professional who is trying to sell you the contract – whether the bonus is worth more to you than any increased charges you will pay for the bonus. This may depend on a variety of factors, including the amount of the bonus credit and the increased charges, how long you hold your annuity contract, and the return on the underlying investments. You also need to consider the other features of the annuity to determine whether it is a good investment for you.

Example:  You make purchase payments of $10,000 in Annuity A and $10,000 in Annuity B. Annuity A offers a bonus credit of 4% on your purchase payment, and deducts annual charges totaling 1.75%. Annuity B has no bonus credit and deducts annual charges totaling 1.25%. Let's assume that both annuities have an annual rate of return, prior to expenses, of 10%. By the tenth year, your account value in Annuity A will have grown to $22,978. But your account value in Annuity B will have grown more, to $23,136, because Annuity B deducts lower annual charges, even though it does not offer a bonus.

You should also note that a bonus may only apply to your initial premium payment, or to premium payments you make within the first year of the annuity contract. Further, under some annuity contracts the insurer will take back all bonus payments made to you within the prior year or some other specified period if you make a withdrawal, if a death benefit is paid to your beneficiaries upon your death, or in other circumstances.




Caution!
If you already own a variable annuity and are thinking of exchanging it for a different annuity with a bonus feature, you should be careful. Even if the surrender period on your current annuity contract has expired, a new surrender period generally will begin when you exchange that contract for a new one. This means that, by exchanging your contract, you will forfeit your ability to withdraw money from your account without incurring substantial surrender charges. And as described above, the schedule of surrender charges and other fees may be higher on the variable annuity with the bonus credit than they were on the annuity that you exchanged.





Example:  You currently hold a variable annuity with an account value of $20,000, which is no longer subject to surrender charges. You exchange that annuity for a new variable annuity, which pays a 4% bonus credit and has a surrender charge period of eight years, with surrender charges beginning at 9% of purchase payments in the first year. Your account value in this new variable annuity is now $20,800. During the first year you hold the new annuity, you decide to withdraw all of your account value because of an emergency situation. Assuming that your account value has not increased or decreased because of investment performance, you will receive $20,800 minus 9% of your $20,000 purchase payment, or $19,000. This is $1,000 less than you would have received if you had stayed in the original variable annuity, where you were no longer subject to surrender charges.

In short:   Take a hard look at bonus credits. In some cases, the "bonus" may not be in your best interest.
Ask Questions Before You Invest 
Financial professionals who sell variable annuities have a duty to advise you as to whether the product they are trying to sell is suitable to your particular investment needs. Don't be afraid to ask them questions. And write down their answers, so there won't be any confusion later as to what was said.
Variable annuity contracts typically have a "free look" period of ten or more days, during which you can terminate the contract without paying any surrender charges and get back your purchase payments (which may be adjusted to reflect charges and the performance of your investment). You can continue to ask questions in this period to make sure you understand your variable annuity before the "free look" period ends.
Before you decide to buy a variable annuity, consider the following questions:
 

Will you use the variable annuity primarily to save for retirement or a similar long-term goal?
	 

Are you investing in the variable annuity through a retirement plan or IRA (which would mean that you are not receiving any additional tax-deferral benefit from the variable annuity)?
	 

Are you willing to take the risk that your account value may decrease if the underlying mutual fund investment options perform badly?
	 

Do you understand the features of the variable annuity?
	 

Do you understand all of the fees and expenses that the variable annuity charges?
	 

Do you intend to remain in the variable annuity long enough to avoid paying any surrender charges if you have to withdraw money?
	 

If a variable annuity offers a bonus credit, will the bonus outweigh any higher fees and charges that the product may charge?
	 

Are there features of the variable annuity, such as long-term care insurance, that you could purchase more cheaply separately?
	 

Have you consulted with a tax adviser and considered all the tax consequences of purchasing an annuity, including the effect of annuity payments on your tax status in retirement?
	 

If you are exchanging one annuity for another one, do the benefits of the exchange outweigh the costs, such as any surrender charges you will have to pay if you withdraw your money before the end of the surrender charge period for the new annuity?


Remember:   Before purchasing a variable annuity, you owe it to yourself to learn as much as possible about how they work, the benefits they provide, and the charges you will pay.

For More Information 
Other SEC Online Publications
 

Mutual Funds and ETFs – A Guide for Investors – Basic information about investing in mutual funds and ETFs. Much of this information applies to variable annuities, as well.

	 

Mutual Fund Investing: Look at More Than a Fund's Past Performance – Describes some of the factors you should consider in choosing a mutual fund.
	 

Mutual Fund Cost Calculator – Allows you to compare the total costs of owning different mutual funds.
	 

Ask Questions – Questions you should ask about all of your investments, the people who sell them to you, and what to do if you run into problems.
	 

Check Out Brokers and Advisers – Describes how to get background information about your broker or investment adviser, including prior employment history and disciplinary actions.
	 

Complaints? What to Do – Describes how to handle a problem with your broker or investment adviser.

Other Web Sites That May Be Helpful
 

FINRA — FINRA is an independent self-regulatory organization charged with regulating the securities industry, including sellers of variable annuities. The FINRA has issued several investor alerts on the topic of variable annuities, and has also issued a release to its members giving guidance on how to present information on the impact of taxes upon investment returns in a variable annuity as compared to a non-specific taxable account. If you have a complaint or problem about sales practices involving variable annuities, you should contact the District Office of FINRA nearest you. A list of FINRA District Offices is available on FINRA's web site.
National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) — The NAIC is the national organization of state insurance commissioners. Variable annuities are regulated by state insurance commissions, as well as by the SEC. The NAIC's web site contains an interactive map of the United States with links to the home pages of each state insurance commissioner. You may contact your state insurance commissioner with questions or complaints about variable annuities. 

How To Contact the SEC With Questions or Complaints

Office of Investor Education and Advocacy
U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
100 F Street, N.E.
Washington, D.C. 20549-0213
Fax: (202) 772-9295
Questions: Fast Answers
Online Complaint Form.

 












          Modified: April 18, 2011
      










STAY CONNECTED
1 Twitter 2 Facebook 3RSS 4YouTube
5 Flickr  6LinkedIn 7 Pinterest 8 Email Updates 

































































